"$2, would you take that deal? I'd take that deal"
Have you wrecked in them yet?
I was thinking 170k max, but if we get another player off the books (Gibson) there would be a small bit more room to maneuver?
a baton is more likely to kill someone than a taser
Cut him a break, he probably just finished watching Training Day. 
100%
1000+
I just assumed it was a combination of clopclop, some people thinking it is cute, and some people thinking the trend is funny. SpaceHaven may have proved my assumption wrong though.
I was wondering why they were so smooth on the tops. 
Clive OWNENS
goodmusicallday.com or just stumbleupon
You are incredibly slow.
Lol. more like crickets * infinity
Middle school yearbooks are never in color
How do you think you're going to become responsible enough for a job? Do you believe time will take care of that?
I can't speak for other women, but I love facial hair.  Well, that's not entirely true.  I love *beards.*  Mustaches and goatees and chinstraps aren't my thing.  
There's no -R option to sort.
I would like to make some clarification that our focus is not ONLY PvE.   A lot of our members have been stressing that we are PvE because most people PvE, and we are simply playing on a PvP server.  We WILL have PvP focus groups as well.  And of course world PvP because of our server type.
Goldies Rustic Pizza at Pender and Seymour is my fave.
Just thought I'd say I really like your drumming.
You were changing the subject by pivoting off an incidental.
Guess we know the answer.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oZ0CXW4Om0k&amp;feature=player_detailpage#t=24s
Like an adult?  Adults don't whine about someone not being nice.  Kids do that when they cry to their mothers.  The fact that you're whining and derailing of "he's not being nice" instead of addressing the points says everything about your position.  I mean, really.  If it had anything behind it you'd just lay the facts down in my face and let them speak for themselves... kinda like how I did in my very first post.  But you don't have shit, and you know it, so you're whining about how I'm not nice rather than about how I'm wrong.  Because it's all you have left to critique me on.  &gt;I especially like that your argument for why I can't be engaged like a human being is because I don't immediately accept your original viewpoint.  That's not what I said, and you know it.  You reacted with a whine rather than facts.  You're an emotionally driven person.  I'm a factually driven person.  So now you're attempting to convince me to change my viewpoint by the way you decide yours: by shame.  Someone shamed you into believing what you do now.  I don't work that way, I work by facts.  You would have to present counter-facts for me to change my view.  But the facts are not on your side, and I'm not nearly as talented as an emotional manipulator as you are.  You don't have the facts to change my mind and I don't have the shaming skills to change yours.  So, we might as well snipe at each other ;)  &gt; because he was a humanist who believed in basically what I am saying.  He was a smart guy, but most people don't realize what he taught.  Things build upon each other.  You can't get to Esteem without having physical needs and security already well taken care of.  And just because they are taken care of now doesn't mean you take them for granted.  So when you do all these changes to society to try to increase the esteem of society... did you even consider the difference it would make in the lower levels?  I mean, really.. "everyone needs to feel good about themselves" while you drive for changes which destroy security by driving businesses overseas.  "People need to be free to do what they want" while you destroy the family.  "Men and women are equal" while destroying that which makes them complementary.  JENGA!  You'll get what you deserve.  The shame is you're going to fuck it up for the rest of us as well.
no.
Glad everyone else I know from Seattle is friendly.
[](/troll "who's holding the camera in the last panel?") 
datass
Ahh sorry then , Crossposting in 3...2...1....
I think the Operation Metro map has some serious balance issues on the second stage. It's too easy to hang out and shoot down the tunnels for the defenders.  Although once they fix squad spawning it might balance a little better.   As for the grammar, I think it's Battlefield's, as Battlefield is a singular franchise. If you have said "in the Battlefield games' linear rush mode" I think it would have been warranted. Don't take my word for it; I'm an engineer, not an English major.
&gt;Everyone I've talked to who voted for Ford doesn't have a problem with cutting services. They're horribly bloated.  Anecdotes aren't evidence. NEXT!  &gt;Take a survey at any protest against service cuts and find out how many people there are apart of a union, are students, or special interests. I'll be surprised if you'll find 5% there who don't fall into those categories.  Claiming that *if* a survey were taken it would support your argument is not the same as having the *actual* results of an *actual* survey which supports your argument. NEXT!  &gt;The VRT is a tax on the middle and lower class.  Are you saying that the lower-class in Toronto all own cars? Is that what you're saying?  &gt;And what value of homes are you looking at? You do realize that any property tax increases on apartment buildings will be passed down through rental rates increases right?  There is a difference in property tax rates for multi-residence properties. I would say homes valued at $500,000 or more should be increased. That is, of course, an estimated value.
YES =/
My count is somewhere in the 130-140 range.. I remember making up a list in my 30s that topped 100.  It's not like I was a ladies man or had a bunch of one-night stands.. it's just when I started making notes I was like, "Oh yea, I forgot about her.. and her... and then her roomate.." hehehe  By the way, any figures a woman gives to you, multiply them by a factor of five at least.  
I'm similar, and have a hell of a time talking with people when there are other conversations going on.  It's almost like I can't *not* listen to the ambient noise/conversations.
Most of Freud's work is no longer taken seriously.  His best works have indeed paved the way for modern Psychology and other huge contributors (Jung is an example, as someone mentioned), and still provide some of the most relevant frameworks when it comes to describing &amp; understanding the basic human mind.  However, if you've indulged into more than an Intro to Psychology class or two, you should know how crazy that man was, and how much nonsense he spewed out alongside of the brilliant thoughts.  Again, that's not to say he isn't one of the greatest contributors ever to the field, but any (tenured or not) professor I've ever had or worked with has said something along the lines of "don't think too much into Freud's theories beyond X and x" when covering something in relation to him.  When you read into them, it's pretty easy to understand why.
Well this woman clearly is evil and manipulative, waiting to falsely accuse this man of abuse. So your consternation is sort of misplaced.   But really, r/mensrights is built to help people like throwaway2019. Literally, they exist to support people like him during crises like the one he is going through, when more official channels can be less than willing to help him out. I can't see any problem with suggesting he find help there.
You still need heatsinks to get heat from the components into the oil, and you need some way to keep the oil circulating around. What were you planning on putting on the other side of that TEC?  I'd say just go with normal water cooling. Water is better for cooling, and the tubing gets it to and from the components very efficiently. You can still go lower than ambient if you want... you can put a chiller in the water reservoir, or make a dual-loop system where you have one cold loop that goes by your components, a heat exchanger, then the hot loop which goes to the radiator.
No it was for the lulz duh!  Don't be mad ;-)
Looks like a ton of fun!
Thank you. I was actually thinking about this today, and wondering if they were in the city, and then I realized how silly that would be.
Forgive me if others have made this observation but..... http://www.reddit.com/r/fffffffuuuuuuuuuuuu/comments/j4rbe/reddit_shirt/
Blow me.
If it is funny, you are forgiven.
its great i highly recommend it
I would advise NOT start taking a highly addictive substance. 
[something similar to this](http://i.imgur.com/ohYbN.jpg)
Alright, thanks for the input. And yes I will be paying for the gas. Thanks for your help!
they went 14-2 without Ocho last year. If he doesn't pick the offense up they can bench or cut him and instead use the guys they already had.  i don't see Ocho having a huge effect or anything but I don't see how he makes them worse.  as for NE in general, it's easy to forget because of the playoff loss but they were the best team in football in the regular season last year. the only noteworthy player they've lost is Light (who may very well come back).   a Jets fan predicting NE to finish 10-6 with no real reason is obviously going to get some flak. If I predicted the Jets to go 8-8 (only 3 games worse than their 2010 record, versus your 4 game difference for NE) without any good reason i'd expect to be called on it too.
Haha, yeah I think the "self-taught math genius" aspect was a bridge too far. World-renowned computer hacker, OK, I'll buy it, she seems misanthropic enough. But add on expert kickboxer, mathematician, chess prodigy, crack investigator... it all just became an elaborate revenge fantasy at some point. I just read on Wikipedia that Larsson never forgave himself for failing to prevent the rape of a 15-year-old girl, which explains a lot.  The Blomkvist character is a clear Mary Sue as well, sleeping with every woman in sight...
I have some timberland chelsea boots that work really well, and don't take 4 hours to lace up like most winter boots. I slip them off under my desk at work.  Not 100% waterproof, but with wool socks they work great for city use--where you don't stay outside for more than 30 minutes at a time, and don't need to walk through lots of deep snow.  I live in a place with very extreme winters, BTW.
**BEADS?!**
There aren't many ways you can speed things up. The more time you take the better the outcome and less fuzz.Try cutting a small section of the book at a time.Easier and slightly faster
Those two events are not related.
&gt;it's not sexist, well, some users are.  I think there are fundamental flaws with the mens' rights subreddits on Reddit in that they *are* sexist (no actually, I think they are plain old bigoted.)  Those subreddits exist to push the agenda that all men are somehow abused and marginalized in modern society, but with few exceptions this is a demonstrably false assertion. Further, while feminists have made alliances with every other type of equal rights group (i.e. LGBT groups, black groups, etc.) the mens' rights movement actively bashes and discourages these groups (i.e. /r/Rights4Men says right on the sidebar "DO NOT POST LINKS TO:... 2. LGBT anything" I guess gay men aren't "men enough" for the mens' rights people.) Men's rights is about pushing the agenda of predominantly white, middle-class, heterosexual males, often to the exclusion of everyone else.  For example, I can easily see the various feminist subreddits discussing some of the problems men face with custody battles and the like, and doing it in a respectful and open way, but on the other hand the mens' rights people tend to vilify every feminist as evil harpies who want to emasculate men. They can't even have a mature discussion about women without bringing in their butt hurt feelings, blaming women for them, then crapping all over women everywhere.
I never had the heart to tell him it wasn't funny.
I definitely request more, you look very nice in that lingerie.
I've never seen that commercial but it sounds gross ಠ_ಠ
Thanks!
I honestly thought everyone used these. Because what the heck else can you clean your self with??
Is there any other way?
get sitepoint's "principles of beautiful webdesign" book for introduction on web design.
No, just make sure you have parents willing to support you into your 30s and 40s.
It is confusing, agreed
Good answer.
Who is this? I used to be an organizer for WAC in Florida. Way to go dude.
wow this literally happened to me two days ago. and also the two days before that.
If it was in the fall, it may well have been nighthawks. They gather in groups of hundreds or thousands when they migrate. And because of their long, narrow wings and rapid, swooping flight they are often mistaken for bats.
PA nor Upstate NY has one but it looks dee-rishous!
Thanks for the help, I have done really intense lace before but never beading I am very excited.   Sunflower stuff is all beautiful I want to make her byzantine scarf as well. Mainly because I am in love with Noro.
Go Minnetonka! 
Cheers that bundle will save me £20 over the separate items. I'll have a look at some extra fans as well.
it sux ;[
Just the idea...it gives me a craftgasm.
Exactly, that's where I stopped reading.
NOT ONE...NOT TWO...NOT THREE...
Beagle? 
Oh bollocks, as if. When 7/7 happened we didn't all automatically wander to the kitchen and switch the kettle on. Stop propagating the myth that we're all Hugh Grant for fucks sake. 
looks like lexi belle
Worked at a Hot n' Now (Similar to Checkers) mid 90's.  They had some stores close down in FL due to health code violations.  Instead of losing money on the product they trucked it out to other stores.  I worked in upstate SC, somewhere along the lines the trucks refrigeration quit and most of the product thawed.  Manager had it loaded in the freezer to use anyway.
Oh, I know that feeling. When you get something good, and you try to get more like it because the first was so damn awesome, but it never works out quite right.
Do you eat fast?   If you chew with your mouth open or eat quickly you're apt to swallow air while you eat
He would still accidentally it all. Dont worry it bro.
Of course!
**YOU MONSTER.**
Me and my entwife have told ourselves we would take a t-break about 3 times the past month, we've still haven't done it and have enjoyed every day.
Upvoted for sheer enthusiasm!
Fine by me. They can have their data, and I can have my cool stuff!
Not a big fan of thunderbird; too bloated. I just install claws-mail, which IMO is the *best* email client available for linux. Way more stable than the others, and a light footprint. Use the "trayicon" plugin to make it minimize to the tray.
Holy shit that is god damned hilarious - I didn't even notice.
Drunk you must think you're a major asshole.
You drink beer while you're pregnant?
 I know what your all thinking.
Thank you for that comment. I really appreciate it. I am so confused and scared that nothing will happen if I don't take the proper steps.
Damn that would make an amazing movie
Because it sucks that's why.
I don't have a point. It's news. I figured that was something that Reddit did. More than anything I'm curious to see how people feel about this; I find it only somewhat odd that a man we're paying with tax dollars are making an agency funded by taxpayers pay rent. A private tenant wouldn't feel odd. All in all it's a considerably small amount of money, but again I thought it seemed interesting.
I do however, believe that America is falling behind in education because there is a large disparity in incomes.  
Proper response:  Sorry about your job/wallet.
And yet you came to comment about it. Interesting.  edit: typo
I know this is a little off topic, but this is for next time you get plastered; before you go to bed, take a tablespoon of honey, two Advil/Tylenol, and a big glass of water. No hangover.
Checkout out Kitchenmonki.com. It has a nice set of tools for planning meals.
Illegal or not, keep up the good work.
The sword made it through three of his chins. Luckily he has at least four.
This is the kind of thing I would buy on the spot just for the humor factor. I have a Noah (like from The Bible) action figure still in its packaging for the same reason. 
yo no hablo espagnol.
The playlist is nothing if not eclectic. It's tempting to make an additional, more booze/addiction focussed one a la coyne's original list, but one step at a time...
You'd have to be an idiot to believe that this is a true story. Only in England...
Man referring to female redditor as "sexy" - OMG WOMEN ARE NOT SEX OBJECTS STOP SEXUALIZING US.  Woman referring to female redditor as "sexy" - no uproar.
Behind the knee
Wow, that fisherman really trawled that fish.
Also, if you want to buy a shirt from them, use the coupon code "SOCUTTERED" for an extra discount.
Nice try....TEPCO!
Wormtail killed the muggles, it just looked like Sirius did it. 
Good start. I feel your rage.
Does anyone here like Arrested Development?
okay i gathered that, was just pleading my case
Looks like a humorless muppet
Of course you don't know what you're good at, you're in college. To figure out what you can do well, you actually need to do stuff.
The contrasting placket and cuffs of the Empire makes my eyes want to choke a baby.  But I'd buy one of the Foothill if it wasn't so expensive. 100 for a casual shirt like that is out of my range.
As a recent FSU graduate and current employee, it pains me to see this considering the Nole head is on the rear window : / 
They're really not that expensive.  I use them like Spanishiwa does.  Pop a nydus at your 3rd and you can instantly saturate it.  And it instantly pays for itself.  I guess if that were cost effective, you'd see Idra doing it.  But I can't see how it's not. 
He's being downvoted because he's lying. idrab means beat in arabic. Saying lgiht is an addition from him. It doesn't say beat lightly. The funny thing is, what if it did say beat light, will that make it better?  And nushuz doesn't mean go crazy. You don't beat crazy people, you seek help. It means to stray. As in be rebellious, disobey,You know, do unislamic things.   What a fucking liar this dude is.
No.
Cause if you like it then you shoulda put a ring on it...  anybody know the song in the video sounds like she is singing in german?
http://www.reddit.com/r/shrug
Nice :)
Too answer your question, as a college student, Houston has been very open minded towards the GLBT scene.  -----  Also, some more info about Rice itself.  http://www.reddit.com/r/houston/comments/gfssv/thinking_of_going_to_rice_university_for/  http://www.reddit.com/r/houston/comments/i9sva/new_rice_grad_coming_to_houston_this_fall_any/  Hope these help :)  Also there is a /r/riceuniversity
Oh, my mom still tells me that she loves me. I just apparently don't know what I'm talking about with any of this stuff. She also just tends to say rather mean things from time to time anyways.  Also, thanks. I'm not sure if I would consider myself brave but I just knew I was getting tired of hiding it and tired of her badmouthing the LGBT community at times just because of ignorance. She knew no one that was part of it so she jumped to many inaccurate conclusions. I knew she wouldn't immediately be all 100% behind it etc but I did expect her to make more progress than having her basically plug her ears and go " la la la "  Talking does help and thanks, I wont be :D
Good. Make sure you take it off before you go to bed. I would hate for you to get a shit streak on your pillow.
In theory, couldn't you just do SS at half speed, either by staying at a weight for twice as long, or by increasing by half the prescribed increment each time?
It looks good.  The light on her face is noticeably brighter than on her hands- with the hands being so close to the source, it should be brighter.  The donut looks like an intensely lit opaque object, rather than a transparent light source.  I don't know how either of these problems could be resolved (hands brighter than face would be distracting) I like it
That is the shizzizzle! I am bedazzled and bejazzled.
Unlisted.. I feel special.
I enlisted as a Christian to be an infantryman. Basic was fun, and AIT was even more fun, but then I got to my first unit. Rapidly became disillusioned and ended up getting out as soon as I could. Most of my unit viewed the military as a big mercenary business, and they scared the hell out of me. I was talking with one guy, and finally asked him flat out, "if we had orders to fire on Americans, would you do it?" and he said "if the money was right."  Hope your experience is different than mine was. Good luck out there. Remember, the way people view you is all about their most recent memory of you. Work hard to clean the killzone when everyone is watching, and they'll make someone else do the shit details when they come up. Also, if you want to step forward and be a leader, your life will suck, but everyone will respect you more.
the headline here is misleading.  That was the argument the group used in 2008 to gain support for Prop 2
The only thing you really need to reboot for are kernel updates, and those can be done live if you're using Ksplice.
r/explainlikeimfive  I honestly don't get what this is doing. No joke.
That's not what this post was about. This post is about OP's disbelief of people who upload images to less efficient image sites. The "what we should upvote or not" issue is just an example used.
YES YES YES, you absolutely can.  Get her ass arrested right the fuck now.  You must teach her that this shit will **NOT** be tolerated!
My favorite cheesesteak joint is a corner store at 15th and Master.  An amazing 'steak and fries combo, for $4.  
The [TNG](http://www.amazon.com/Star-Trek-Next-Generation-Technical/dp/0671704273/ref=sr_1_1?s=books&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1312156776&amp;sr=1-1) and [DS9](http://www.amazon.com/Star-Trek-Space-Technical-Manual/dp/067101563X/ref=sr_1_3?s=books&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1312156801&amp;sr=1-3) technical manuals are both cool resources and are packed with jargon that is easily referenced.  Those plus Memory Alpha should give you plenty of technobabble to go on.
Trying to discreetly Reddit at work. Failing.  Cannot stop laughing..  
Ahem, "No true Scotsman is an intentional logical fallacy, an ad hoc attempt to retain an unreasoned assertion.[1] When faced with a counterexample to a universal claim, rather than denying the counterexample or rejecting the original universal claim, this fallacy modifies the subject of the assertion to exclude the specific case or .others like it." -http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/No_true_Scotsman. Not only does it apply to this situation, it applies to any refutation of a universal claim when a counterexample is provided. Furthermore, it is up to the person to decide if they are a christian, not the bible. It is a little like this. You probably wouldn't consider a christian to be an atheist would you? But what if they identify themselves as an atheist? Their reasoning could be that they believe only in god but not in the FSM or in Allah. Because they don't believe in those gods they are atheistic towards them, and consider themselves to be an atheist who believes in one more god than normal. Just because they don't meet your criteria doesn't mean they aren't what they say they are. What about the gay marriage debate? When people say that gay people cannot truly be married because they aren't heterosexual couples does that mean all marriage doesn't apply to them? They defined marriage for themselves and decided a meaning for it that applies to them. Of course it doesn't sit well with some people but does that mean that it doesn't apply? And no, like you said, there are no true christians but there are no untrue christians either. That is my point.
So I should post a picture of the insides of the books all lined up?
OS X 10.7 makes it easy to not install.
old enough to pee, old enough for me
Yes. Add me.
I have body shaper underwear which is useful for when I wear very tight dresses, and normal underwear would create lines and little bulges along the elastic which would ruin the look of the dress. I find it doesn't make me look thinner at all, just smoother.   You should only wear them if you feel comfortable...  I think the issue here is that your mum has got something for you which she thinks will help with a part of your body that you're insecure about, but to you this is coming across as "your body is not okay and acceptable the way it is and it must be moulded and reformed in order to make it good enough". Which is a fair enough way for you to feel.   Why not talk to your mum about how you are feeling? I could imagine my mum doing something like this completely innocently and not realising the implications.
Haha "but fuck it".
i bet if we each threw in five dollars we could burn a lot of it
1stBank, bar none.
Find some ents to smoke with! :D
??  Seriously?  Yes, exercise.  It's a good thing.  If you want to, exercise.  You may have the case of the "feels like craps" the first couple weeks on keto where your energy level is lower than normal.  This is part of the keto adjustment process and takes about 2-3 weeks to get over.  Once you get passed that, and don't cheat, your energy level will return to at least what it was before.  I finish my couch to 5k program this week.  I've been on keto the last 4 weeks.  Didn't stop me at all.
Are you J.D?
ಠ_ಠ
Tradition often outweighs cruelty in third world countries, but you'd think Spain would be a bit more self-aware.
I could say the same about far-left posts, except they're circle jerked into the god damn ceiling.
Happy birthday (and toking) man!
People that write articles like this always confuse me: &gt;for years apple have been confusing us by not buying things they clearly should be buying  How and why does this guy think he has a better business model than one of the richest companies in the world? 
You really need to share some code and a pic of what you're aiming to do. 
If no one else is on the MCOMM. I'll camp it. When lone wolves are trying to plant it's easy kills and good for the team.  I understand, the D has unlimited deaths, so there's a need for rushers to steal tickets, but a couple dudes on the MCOMM sounds A-OK.
I like how the lady in the glee movie commercial says not to see it. 
That's a violation of every major merchant agreement. Call the hotline on your debit card and report them.
Typical config is to draw air in the front and shoot it out the top and back. I do it that way and it hasn't blown it up yet.   What size are the fans? Probably don't need all 6 to cool efficiently. 
It was the fourth child she birthed this month...so sorry. 
You psychopaths don't deserve reasoning and true answers any more. The counter arguments to all of libertarianism's sociopathic positions are out there, they have been argued, you people have chosen to ignore them. It is not our obligation to sit there and patiently explain why you are wrong every time your panties get a little wet for Ron Paul. You don't get real answers any more, you just get dismissed, just like all the other crazies.
Click no glass?
Yep! Give it a try.
If you are going to misunderstand a question do it on r/trees!
I switched from a Canon 40D to a Nikon D700 and couldn't be happier. Pictures are sharper, low light performance is incredible, and the menus and controls are perfect. Rent the camera you are considering and see how it performs. I also realize the 40D and D700 are not exactly apples to apples :D
All action has to be done twice over?  Right
im giving you my upvote 
True, but I don't mean that in terms of being a millionaire - even if I end up only working in legal aid (which is one of my possible ambitions), I'm still going to end up out-earning him. It's interesting the way we value different kinds of labour.
I never liked the cookie monster metal.
shaders are an incredible thing.  I have to say, i like the style of realistic but still trying to retain the cartoony game feel. i LOVED how wood and stone/cobble looked with the texture pack and the shaders. i might have to download minecraft again.
shove edible down throat, if he doesn't choke he'll be good, green dragon may go down easier. 
They're really good. That's what made them popular.
Yeah, you don't have to be selected *again*. That was bad wording by them.
Very awesome! Thanks!
Have you been there lately?  The admin does not even do anything on there.  I uploaded several articles recently I spend days preparing only to have them in a "awaiting approval by admin"...&amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Like I said, that would not prove anything unless you're actually qualified to assess research papers.  Links to articles and magazines are not credible sources.
If these are her only funds, she really has no choice and must withdraw at least a portion of them.  However, as an investment the stock market has historically outperformed all other investments.
Not quite. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pedro_Filho  The other sources are in the Portuguese article (which I read/speak).  "He has claimed over 100 victims, 47 of them prison inmates"
:)
Codex, lately. 
I got a beta invite to bf3 and the newer apb can't run either of them 
&gt; Seriously, multi-billion dollar extremely profitable corporations are paying pennies on the dollar in taxes due to the tax code.  So I take it you would oppose the so-called Fair Tax? Every one pays equal share of the pie. As fair as it gets, IMO.  Before you go off on rant on me here, I've no party affiliation and I'm certainly not supporting either party on this issue. I think this is an issue that should've been dealt with years ago and in a more graceful manner. I do cut Obama some serious slack for inheriting all these shitty situations all in one term. But I simply cannot support someone playing, IMO, class warfare (though I'm aware that you think otherwise).
&gt;in something whose very essence is existence  That is absurdly ill-defined.
I've been here 5 years, this is the first I've seen it. Be quiet, noob.
that's because you haven't heard my version of "Cry Eagles Cry"  I like the Eagles, but the spelling gets REALLY annoying
Again, probably not illegal, but I doubt they would be happy if they knew he was doing it.  
you are a mong amongst...wait...shit.
Unyes.
I'd try it again making sure you are properly hydrated and well rested.  Pick a spot near the door (usually cooler) too.   A few times i've experienced classes that were SIGNIFICANTLY hotter than others... maybe that was the case for you?  Finally, a class packed with tons of people is usually hotter.  Try like a 6am class if you can, those are pretty dead where i go.
Yeah man I was eating dinner and came back to watch the match and was like "okay boxer is red cool" and as red's tanks were getting owned they were like AND MVP TAKING A LOT OF DAMAGE.  Confused the shit out of me &gt;.&lt;
This too, the last thing I want is my retainer falling in the toilet.  *Shudder*
Best strap on ever!
all of the above in this order: breaking bad, game of thrones, dexter, mad men
Except he was in an F-18 *grumble grumble*
Better movies have background noise recorded on set, in part so that the ADR doesn't just sound like a really bad overdubbing. (Source: I've been an assistant on many shitty independent short films)
Draw the curve e^x and visualize extruding it off of the paper so that it looks like a quarter pipe ramp. Going up and down the ramp would indicate changes in the x direction. The ramp has a slope in the x direction. If you place a skate board in the x direction, the skateboard will roll down the slope.  Going side to side on the ramp would indicate changes in the y direction. The ramp has no slope in the y direction. If you place a skate board in the y direction, the skateboard will not roll anywhere.   We also use the same idea while skiing or snowboarding. If you want to stop sliding down the mountain, stand in the y direction, not the x direction.
Having taken an oath to obey and uphold the Constitution under any and every circumstance and then doing something like circumventing congressional powers I think qualifies as perjury. I doubt they would win, but I think that would be their justification.
I live in Point Grey. I have friend in other areas of Kits paying around 600.
I've done it like 6 times in the last 3 days and it hasn't happened for me yet...
Leona :)
I think if you're going to use punctuation, do it properly or not at all. Showing that you know what periods and commas are for but neglecting apostrophes, capitals and hyphens in your sentences emphasises a weak grasp of language on a language-sensitive topic. On that note, I regret to inform you that your response 'sucked'.
Since the branches were so easily crumble-able I imagine a chainsaw would glide through like a warm knife through butter.
Yeah, that wasn't really in the crossword...  The rest is True Story, though.
You are right. It was a lapse of judgement on my part.
I have not yet gone. I have my first appointment this Tuesday 
I find they always look better in the bra than natural ones but are sub par compared to naturals when naked.
he couldve EASILY said "happy burthday alan turing [...]" and wouldve saved A LOT of people (i guarantee) the trouble of googling, or at least wouldve made them not ignore his post immediately.
That's a treatment for a psychological phenomenon known as [phantom limb sensation](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Phantom_limb). With phantom limb sensation you can feel as though you still have a limb once it has been amputated, and at times it feels as though the limb is in great pain such as a strong cramp. You can use a mirror to mimic the opposite limb to give the illusion that you still have the amputated limb, which can help relieve the pain.
I went off the Black Mages version.  I added in the intro thing at the beginning, 1st part of BM, 2nd part, interlude, 3rd part, skipped the battle music part, last part, added outro.  Thanks :D.  I didn't hang around to find out lol.  Played the prelude and got the hell out of there.
Well modders have made additional quests  http://www.moddb.com/mods/vtm-the-final-nights  http://www.moddb.com/games/vampire-the-masquerade-bloodlines/mods
yuck
I saw that when I went to your account and saw your comments (just to make sure you knew what you were talking about) :D
Saw me on the sofa!
They have a board game meetup every Monday.
Nice try Smokes.  You almost gave me a heart attack with that tub of delicious delicious fries. 
smiling because they know they've lost if i'm still happy.
That couldn't be farther from the truth. I thought I would hate 'The Wire'. Took me forever to watch it. And I loved it. 
Err, sorry for the "bacteria viruses". I seem to have changed my mind about what I was going to write mid-sentence as I suddenly remembered that colds are caused by viruses and not bacteria.  Thanks for the answers. :) 
Or to filter out SFW when im in the mood.
Tommy Pickles in the flesh
[Amazing 10 minute colour video](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TwahIQz0o-M&amp;feature=player_embedded#at=13) of London in 1927.
It's actually r/islam and we have a link to their subreddit on our sidebar.
Colorado
Shit i didn't realize they had that.... 
You wanted to eat fire?
If you want one, make sure you [request a reprint](http://www.threadless.com/product/2058/Never_argue_with_a_90_degree_angle_It_s_always_right).
You seem to be avoiding my questions and instead attempting to lecture me, dare i say this is an attempt at 'Womansplaining' or an attempt to shut-down my frank discussion of Feminist inaction on mens issues?
The house is just fine. The problems I can see are:  * You are standing in the house. * It's dawn.  NPCs won't come if you are too close to the house, and they won't come at night.  Go mining or something, away from the house. Keep at least 50 silver with you. He'll show up sooner or later. 
As I undersand it, the original belif in the Bible was one of Physical ressurection of the Body, not becasue you had an immortal soul but by the grace of god. There was no need of a hell in this model, simply thouse who would be ressurected and thouse who would reamin dead.   This idea persisted right into the middle ages when some theologens still debated weather or not Cannibals could be saved. Some took the position that the bodies of cannibles had been stolen (in bite sized peices) from other humans, and hence could not be ressurected.  The idea of an immortal soul came in from Greek Philosophy. 
[](/wetodddog "OH FUCK")
prepare to see a camper there the next time you use it
I know it seems scary but the worst that can happen is he says he's not interested. Have a think about what you want to say and then put it into words. I've made a fool out of myself more times than I care to remember but at least I tried. At the end of everything, I can honestly say "I tried" and that is worth everything :)  If you need help putting it into words, we fellow redditers can surely help you out :)
shit on their windshield.
metal? oh god that sounds much worse than what I was thinking  wait if it's metal and not rubbery how the fuck do you get it off????
sweet ground sausage, box of bow tie noodles, bottle of ragu garlic something or another alfredo sauce. cook sausage, boil noodles, add sauce to meat, strain noodles and mix.   it's pretty awesome, rather cheap, and is enough for lunch the next day or two as well. 
Exactly: someone else linked to this earlier in the week and I still have no idea what's mysterious about that. Guy dies, no identification, case over. Why is this a mystery? 
Ret, Slush and IdrA would not take it.  
Gross. Is that a freckle?
Yikes, see I had a feeling I was too harsh. Firstly, even a 1 has natural beauty (albeit, not too much of it). Secondly, a 5 and half or 6 is above average, as I made great pains to explain. A 5 is average. You are above average; thus, you're kinda cute. I suppose I wasn't very helpful and just bashed away, so I'm sorry if it upset you or anything, but I was just trying to be honest.
I don't have a review, so I've not seen the insides of that version of the psu, but I do know the Antec Basiq b500U was okay. The platform for the orginal was FSP and they make various average psu's. They won't blow up your system is what I am trying to say.  As far as the one you bought I don't want to say I know what platform it came off but if its one of the newer FSP's then it is decent enough. An example of the newer FSP platform would be [The StealthXtreme 2 from OCZ](http://www.hardwaresecrets.com/article/OCZ-StealthXStream-2-600-W-Power-Supply-Review/1058/2) which was a pretty nice update to the original StealthXtreme. Once again though without seeing inside that Antec I couldn't tell you if it was or not. ** So what does it mean if there is no review?** Simply put it could just mean no review samples have been sent to the accepted reviewers. I'll say that much about it as you can speculate why not, but there really is no telling. This happens from time to time that a company will neglect shipping units to decent reviewers, and in some cases they send them to everyone they shouldn't( that happened with Kingwins 1000W gold psu which we had a big discussion about, they eventually did send a review and it turned out okay from what I remember.)  **EDIT:Due to nubbinators post I've found a site that tells me which companies have made which platform. The Platform is from Delta and BP430 which should be the same platform did fairly well, it's just to bad this site isn't in english.**  **[The link for your psu's review.](http://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;prev=_t&amp;rurl=translate.google.com&amp;sl=auto&amp;tl=en&amp;u=http://www.itocp.com/htmls/69/n-1369.html)**
So how much does this impulse color the rest of your outlook? That is, do you find yourself more tolerant of marginalized people with weird urges, like zoophiles? What has been your experience with religion? What do you think of society's treatment of the handicapped?
Hard drive's dying. Back up your data NOW. There's nothing you can do about it except get a new hard drive.
This reminds me of why I respect Brian Eno.
WHY ARE WE ALL TYPING IN CAPS?! ["This is bullshit, you can't ground a panda"](http://24.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_lin79wovEd1qbnlu6o1_500.jpg)
I didn't like that at all.  It made it seem like Felix Felicis made him drunk, which is not the case according to Rowling's description.  It was supposed to clear the senses, instill confidence and comfortable certitude in one's actions.  Radcliffe was just teetering around with a goofy grin and slightly slurred speech.  I dunno how much of that is his fault, as opposed to Yates or someone else directing him to act that way...  But regardless, I was not a fan of that interpretation, and I don't think it displayed any notable acting range/skill.
You are reading *way* too much into that.  he pointed to a relevant subreddit where men have gone through that before.  Since the law and society materially and explicitly treat men different than women in cases of domestic abuse, it's entirely logical to have sex-specific support forums for the like.  It's not about "how evil and manipulative women are", it's about *one, specific woman*.  As far as I have noticed here, no one else has generalized "all women".  The closest I've seen here is "all crazy women" and jokes aside, that's a pretty specific subgroup.
How does force accelerate an object? Because F=ma is true.  How does mass distort spacetime? Because Einstein's equation, G_ab = 8πT_ab is true.
We have these in Florida... I don't understand why people don't walk just outside?
Haha good point.
Well, they're from NY, bought a couple at the flea market in Fort Green, Brooklyn.
I've only recently started to not do this sometimes.  Still fail often though.
I'd be happy to go on a cruise in that lifeboat.
2 miles?  Save your money and ride a bicycle.
TotalWarSteamGroup
Rune pages cost 6300 IP each, however that IP takes sometime to farm and Rune pages aren't as satisfying as a new champion.
The must be white-list services, so it's not blocking but rather "letting through" certain domains.  And like macktastick, I saw a market, a need, and I delivered a tool. Guns don't kill people, people kill people :D
I had basically the same experience with beer. 
le derp
Shower puffs? That's fucking *adorable*.  We Brits call them Scrunchies, as I recall.
Thanks! I didn't think you were trying to be mean; plus, if you were, I wouldn't have been offended. I'm fat, so...it's coo.
doesn't it add too much bulk though?
We all have our stereotypes. Deal with it.
I get that you are frustrated, but it's not easy for anyone, and it's not cool to put other people down when they have lost any amount of weight because it's not easy for anyone. 
You, my good sir, are a genius.
CCD?
Fire them all, people can police themselves, I say!
Some cats are climbers.  Some aren't.
When did I whine ? You are one of those sheep that will keep going without asking why the sheep in the front are hanging upside down bleeding .....  I got something out of it "fun" but Riot got the better of it .... I brought them costumers I brought them more players which make matchmaking faster and I spend around 50€ on the game myself .   You may call it free but it is very profitable for RIOT and as a user that is also partially responsible for their success (as every player that has more than lvl 5 ) I can whine if I want to ! Best part is they will listen sooner or later because Riot understands that if I go to play any other game I will take my friends with me . If I go they are not only losing 1 potential customer they probably lose all the guys I brought with me . If allot of people get bored of the game cuz there is no new content and they start complaining and RIOT responds with "stfu game is free" they lose all of these players !   It is not an argument ! 
You fail to understand little humans. Attention, even negative, is a reward. You must withhold attention when they're bad and give it when they're good.  You can escalate the negative, but short of abuse, very few negatives outweigh the plus of attention.  Inattentive parenting does coincide with that behavior, but that behavior is not always indicative of inattentive (or merely lax) parenting.  Sometimes, you just have to ignore them in public to get this to sink in. Kids are like bureaucrats: their chief interest is controlling you to their own benefit, and they have more time than you do. Your best strategy is to figure out what they really want and use that to get the outcome you want.  Teaching kids manners by coercion doesn't get buy-in from the kid. Like it or not, there's a shelf-life on controlling children. Making them comply is very different from convincing them to comply.  Should you choose to make parenting about force, you'll reap the rewards come teenage years. I humbly suggest that children are needy enough that you have enough tools to get them to behave, at the expense of the sometimes uncomfortable cost of letting them determine that public nagging doesn't work.
gooners, laughed when i saw that red devils crest
You're 14? Damn... wow... you're young as hell brother...
Just to spoil it for everybody, this is a trick. There is a piece of fishing line coming out of his hat that connects to a lamp post (not in picture) that keeps him suspended.
Each time I see it on the front page it's delicious karma whoring
Windows 7 was optimised to run on netbooks, which didn't exist when vista shipped.
ITS KILLING ME
You're asking god to take your survey?
I like it (: You're smokin'
The way I've come to define it such that it's realistic is that *free will is the unique behavior that stems from the intersection of the internal state of an individual and the external state of it's environment*.  It's not saying anything supernatural about why the behavior happens, just that it does.
$1500 a year.
How cute! Pictures?
25 or six to four ...
Ehh.  Taco Bell is cheap, but it's not good food.  My recommendation is to find the hole in the wall places in the little shithole towns you drive through.  They're usually a local secret of sorts, and stay in business because the entire town loves it.  I make a policy of it whenever going on a road trip, and try to avoid chains when possible.  On the drive to our honeymoon, our GPS, combined with some road closures due to summer road work took us on a rather long detour that took us to a microbrewery in a hole in the ground town in Colorado.  Great food, and damned good beer.  Also, you may find pickled eggs in some gas stations on the way, usually central US, or through the southern US.  I rather like them, and grab one on any road trip, even if my wife hates the pickle breath afterwards.
under rated comment is under rated
I'm guessing keeping a window cracked and blowing towards that would be sufficient enough to not leave smell? I'm still on the fence on the MFLB, and would love to try before I buy. 
&gt; The narwhal bacons at midnight.  I think I officially hate that more than anything ever.
&gt;it's rather trivial to defend against blueflame for a fraction of their investment  Roaches deal 16 damage a shot, which means you need six roaches to one-shot hellions. Six roaches costs the same as 6 hellions (in theory, more, since gas is so vital to Zerg builds), but it only takes one split or one drop to decimate the mineral line.  Also hellions are faster than roaches EVEN on creep and with gilial reconstituion. Once the hellions are dropped, drones are going to die.  tl;dr: making roaches alone does not stop this build
[tags]
[I am a gas station AMA](http://imgur.com/B7mBo)
Wat?
They're not critics of religion, they're scientists. [Louis Pasteur](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Louis_Pasteur#Faith_and_spirituality) was Catholic.
&gt; Unbiased source like wikipedia  Cant anyone edit wikipedia pages?
You mean you don't go to AA to meet dealers? FUCK, I've been doing it wrong the whole time.
Mm agreed. : )
Hahahaha!  I'm 35 and Fred Durst looks old enough to be my father.   What the fuck happened to him?
Did you bother reading them?  They acknowledged driving while high is a danger.  Context fail.  
I had it explained to me that men should put the seat down because using the toilet with the seat up constitutes 1/4 of all possible human/toilet interactions, so the likelihood of the next person needing to use the toilet for the same purpose is 25%. Therefore you should put it back down as a service to the next person who uses it.  I have also heard that you should leave the bathroom as you came to it. If the seat was down, you should put the seat back down.  But I'm a girl and I don't sit on anything without looking to make sure it isn't covered with rusty nails or something. That's just dumb.
I have a paras, would you trade a treecko?
Nej, det där är Trädgården, i Stockholm!
Oh look, the right answer is buried in r/politics.
Just looking back at it now, it's sort of an antithesis to the picture of Adam touching god's hand
Would you do it if you could get a superior prosthetic? 
*Points to section 4 clause 18 in the Conversation Rulebook*
I know I'm not pc enough, but can I just get breakfast without the hug?
herp, derp, me gusta, and Y U NO can all die in a fire for all i care. other ones are quality though
Statistically it's more dangerous for you to walk while drunk than it is to drive. You're very unlikely to have an accident in a car unless you are very drunk; being just as drunk and walking puts you at far more risk per-mile of getting in an accident. Plus if you're in an accident in a car it's more likely that you'll injure other people (which is not a mindset I approve of, but I think it's interesting to point out), whereas any accident as a pedestrian is likely to kill or injure you.
[ For a universe that's supposed to be half Chinese, Firefly sure doesn't have any Asians](http://m.xkcd.com/561/)
oh, oops, i need to learn this shit
Fucking liar, there are no bubbles there!
I actually agree with RandianHero here. I have been in a LDR where we met on the internet and only saw each other about once a month at most, and at the time it seemed perfectly fine, but now I am in a normal relationship (and by normal i mean not long distance) I realise that the LDR wasnt good and wasnt really a proper relationship, it was just a rather bad parody of one. So although I know it may seem like this relationship is real and you are both in love, but I think you will realise after it is all over (if you dont end up getting married and live happily ever after) that it really wasnt as much of a relationship as you thought it was. 
Stores that aren't geared for fat people do not go above XXL.  Do you think that people who are bigger than that size just don't wear clothing?   Something tells me you wouldn't like that very much.
Yikes, see I had a feeling I was too harsh. Firstly, even a 1 has natural beauty (albeit, not too much of it). Secondly, a 5 and half or 6 is above average, as I made great pains to explain. A 5 is average. You are above average; thus, you're kinda cute. I suppose I wasn't very helpful and just bashed away, so I'm sorry if it upset you or anything, but I was just trying to be honest.
The problem with that is that mirrors don't perfectly reflect things. If you've ever shined a laser into a mirror you can see that a lot of of the light bounces off of the glass surface rather than the mirror surface, a nd that means that after a few reflections the light just stops.  [Endless mirrors] (http://www.flickr.com/photos/caut/3346922470/) are also an example of this phenomenon, you can see that they get darker and darker because there's less and less light being reflected.
I think you should wait until they make a new version of the 3DS, which should be coming out in about a year or two. By that point all the kinks with the system will have been smoothed out and the game will have a much larger library for you to mess around with.
[The original video has better quality.](http://vimeo.com/15091562)
I feel it would be more appealing with the car set further towards the left edge of the frame.  It seems to give moving objects more of a feeling of movement if that makes any sense.
Ah, that makes sense then, thanks for the heads up!
They do have Ryan Miller. A bit of an American hero for a few months.
Then give it some 'in'.
Have you concidered getting a job as a fishmonger or fisherman?  what happens if you take chlorphyl tabs or something like that.
Outlook would be AWESOME! Not that I won't use the word one, but I definitely use outlook more, and that would just really ensure I never do real work again.
[Source](http://www.degree.bigcartel.com/product/coming-soon)  EDIT: More like thousands of silhouettes.
Feel free to leave. If you don't like what is popular, don't browse the subreddit.
Awesome...just need to find a way from campus to get there. 
- I'm from Toronto and I love it - I'm actually pretty ok with my bell service - Don't use Canada Post, no opinion
Will the right wingers be repeating "read the bill" like they did for almost all of 09?
I actually learned this yesterday, but still, this is NOT what I was taught as a child.  When/why did this change?  If there are three groups of people and the largest consists of 45%, what do you call them if they aren't the majority?
Thanks a lot man, all input is appreciated.
I need to start reading the titles more often. I thought you were telling some bizarre story to yourself.
The ref didn't allow it, as it's "against the rules of the game." Didn't stop ManU from doing it with Chicharito, though, did it?
Oh yeah, I've listened to them to death already ha ha. SOMETIMES I NEED SOMEONE TO HOLD ME TIGHT! EXPLAIN ME: WHAT IS JUSTICE, WHAT IS RIGHT?!
&gt; Humans are animals.  If any Christians need proof, they should watch The Human Centipede.
My point is there are many ways to be dangerously distracted on the road, but cannabis gets attention because its a drug, and the assumption is that it's users don't have the responsibility to not drive when they're too impaired.  All my anecdotal experience says cannabis users first of all aren't that dangerous on the road, and second have enough responsibility to know that they're too impaired to drive.  I'm much more afraid of old people, who, honestly, are much more dangerous than a stoned person.
[DARK Reddit Web 2.0](http://userstyles.org/styles/44492/dark-reddit-web-2-0-bemp-auto-width) - the overall dark theme.  [Reddit Enhancement Suite](http://reddit.honestbleeps.com/) - everyone knows this.   [Reddit HD](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/moobcofpkchikjhkiclhchfmgmecolck) -Hides chunks of reddit. They slide in when you hover that area. I hide the right and the bottom.  These all DO work together. The comments/replies will be messy at first. You need to goto RES preferences, then Style Tweaks config page and turn off "highlight comments for easier reading."  I also had my custom top bar showing up in black text. This is a bit trickier to fix. Goto the RES javascript file, goto line 5079 and remove the color code that sets the text black.   edit: to honestbleeps and greensticky (authors of RES and DARK) I've messaged you with confilicting info over the past few days. It seems the only bug in everything is the css code on line 5079 that messes up the custom top bar. 
&gt; common ancestor" survive  Because traits that made it more able to live with its surrounds were naturally selected and diverged from the original.  An easy way to understand this is to look at dogs.  Humans basically short cut evolution by breeding dogs that had favourable traits, eg retrieving, protecting, carrying loads, size etc. 
the music for that video made me lose my appetite.
no love for Brew Crew?
I'll second this.  Using a contrasting/ exotic wood and accentuate them rather than trying to hide them might make more sense if the woods are mismatched to begin with.  Putty is for small cracks and never looks good on anything as large as a screw hole.
woah. daynine is looking SHARP AS HELL
Hey, I'd love to join, I am 19 and I have been Looking for a fun server to play around on. username sparx578
Well you don't want to tell people you took MDMA, that would be misleading.
Yeah, that would be a big nightmare when you start trying to decide what the curriculum would be.  I think this is more of a cultural mindset than an institutional issue.
What program(s) are you using?  It might be your computer.  Why don't you try Ubuntu to make sure.  You can install it on a USB memory.
Boxer! Boxer! Boxer! 
You should probably see Angel Beats! if you haven't already, too.
This is just the Muhammad cartoon argument rehashed and given a Christian coat of paint.  The fact that something is "beloved" does not exempt it from mockery.  Quite the opposite, actually.  Beloved cultural icons are *more* deserving of mockery and ridicule than backwater ideas that nobody actually gives a shit about.  One of the hallmarks of maturity is understanding that "sacred" is a subjective concept that some people don't even recognize in the first place.  Another hallmark of maturity is being able to take a joke at your own expense.  You might come up and say that a hallmark of maturity is not offending people on purpose, and you'd have a point if she was telling the joke in a Church or to a person she knew would be overly-sensitive.  But when you're out and about in public it's unreasonable to expect that people will tailor their speech to fit your sensibilities.  The onus is on sensitive adults to avoid speech they might find offensive while in public.
Because it's **Israel's** fault? If the Palestinians had the right to return to their OWN HOMELAND, that wouldn't a problem, now would it?
When I was 16 the pipe running from the toilet got backed up and I was in the basement running a snake through it. Broke the jam and of course the backed up human waste came rushing out. I sidestepped the worst of it, but still got spattered pretty good. I was just starting to wipe the chunky stuff off my pants when my sister yelled down that my girlfriend had just shown up with her favorite aunt to introduce her to me. They were at the top of the stairs, so there was no way out except past them. She was nice about it, said I was good to be helping out on such a dirty job without complaining, but she was only in her mid-20s and hotter than my girlfriend, so that didn't help much.
Yeah, but you sort of learn that Americans seem to think everyone in Britain is English, unless they're Irish.
sure he'll get paid, but the UFC is the big stage now, and i think with a few things added to his game he really could be a contender.
Clarke was heavily involved with the film. There are some changes from the original novel, but it was felt that the removed sequences would have detracted from the film's climax.   The film version of the second book in the series: 2010, is similarly faithful to the story though they sacrifice some of the hard science in order to make the film more acceptable to a mainstream audience.
Dragon*Con. I recognize the hyatt's tacky ass carpeting all too well
i downvoted you because you think not going to the hospital that didnt take his insurance was a stupid idea  if it wasnt life threatening then why put yourself into thousands if not tens of thousands of dollars worth of debt?
Another Bostonian here! JP, Specifically.
What a bitch.
"We only made out"  LIE OF THE CENTURY
A lot of the experiences that people are posting about are making me scratch my head, because they are so extreme of what what I read and experienced myself. For instance seeing anyone or hearing voices is extreme in and of itself, but actually seeing weird creatures or spiders that try to attack is almost unbelievable. Interestingly enough each culture has their own take on it. For instance in Korea they call it Kwa-wee (sissors) and they explain it with an old story about a virgin bride who died before her wedding. A friend of mine told me that some religious group in Southeast Asia or something reported seeing demons sitting on their chest (a bunch of them mysteriously died in their sleep as well). That is the most extreme case of hallucinating that I had heard of. It makes me want to say that these are not episodes of sleep paralysis, but dreams that are being experienced as they drift back to consciousness. Since so much can happen in a second it wouldn't be unreasonable to assume that these people are waking up from a dream and as more stimuli from their surrounding adds input to their dream world the world is being switched from an environment mainly constructed from the subconscious to a world largely constructed from consciousness. And in this since its more of a semi conscious state.   When I'm in sleep paralysis I am fully conscious and can look at anything in my room so long as my face is angled the right way. Had I not known about sleep paralysis before I had my first experience with it I would have been freaking out. The only reason I knew about the toe wiggling trick is because I had a friend who said she found an unmarked grave out by her house in middle school. Since then she said that she would sometimes be laying there and all of a sudden not be able to move. She said it would freak her out and then she would just focus on moving a toe and then everything seemed to lift off of her and she would be able to move. So I knew how I was going to get out of it before I even had my first experience. It worked like a charm and I sat up like, "holy crap that is pretty awesome."  And since you say that you perceived mobility in your toes and fingers, I want to say that what you experienced there was not an episode of sleep paralysis. If it were you would not be able to move your fingers and toes or feel that you were moving them. As soon as I wiggle a toe even an iota I break free and can sit up and its a struggle to get that toe to move. It isn't easy. Its not like I'm wiggling my toe and then opening my eyes and sitting up. I'm laying there unable to move staring at the ceiling then I wiggle a toe and feel freedom in my entire body and I can move around freely.   Yea a lot of these descriptions of sleep paralysis aren't really sleep paralysis. 
Yes. It's very confusing.
Seriously, unless you live in Kuwait or SaudiArabia...what makes this NSFW? 
"I give you"   Implying that you were somehow behind this./
&gt;let you voice be hard here.  Well said.
But it would still not be able to pay all of its obligations, which credit rating agencies have already said is tantamount to a default, and would result in our interest rate spiking.
Am I the first person to think, "Great, another addition to the homeless epidemic in Santa Cruz" ?
Oh my...
I'm not bothered about downvotes, as long as i get an answer, which i did. Thank you very much! 
I don't think the lottery winners would crash the lottery system though because what they basically do is take all the money from tickets that are purchased, put it in a pot, take 20% off the top for themselves, and then divide the remainder amongst the winners.  So instead you'd find thousands of people winning the lottery and only getting slightly more than the cost of the ticket, say.   Plus small variations in the lottery system will cause different numbers to be pulled out - after the first lottery that a thousand people win, they might look into the "bimbo of the week" girl who pulls the lever to start the lottery balls moving about for corruption and temporarily replace her. The replacement might pull the lever half a second later and that would give a completely different result. Butterfly effect and all that...   All that said, your premise is fantastic. I hope it will be in the amazon store when it's finished as I'd gladly pay $5 to read it provided the quality of the writing itself is at least passable :)
You should probably clarify that not having kids =/= not having a future for the relationship. Personally I hope my marriage continues about the way it is now (I'd be fine with kids, but not overwhelmingly inclined in that direction at this point).  That said, yeah if he's going to become the religious drunk I'd bail too, but then I'm pretty noisy about my lack-o-belief.
Jones Soda also ships and makes awesome soda. My personal favorite was the "Key Lime" flavor... but it looks discontinued... the bubblegum flavor is good too. I have not tried them all.  http://www.jonessoda.com
I just joined, thanks for the heads up.
It's inside Daenerys the whole time.
[Nicaragua vs. Costa Rica - November 2010](http://www.wired.com/dangerroom/2010/11/google-maps-error-blamed-for-nicaraguan-invasion/)  &gt;An embarrassing error on Google Maps has been blamed for Nicaragua’s accidental invasion of Costa Rica. Last week, Nicaraguan troops crossed the border, took down a Costa Rican flag and defiantly raised their own flag on Costa Rican turf.  &gt;But the troops’ commander, Eden Pastora, told a Costa Rican newspaper, La Nacion, that his invasion was not his fault, because Google Maps mistakenly said the territory belonged to Nicaragua. Government officials in Nicaragua have also blamed a “bug in Google” for the error.  We used to play "Capture the Flag" when I was a kid. This sounds like a grand, fun time for all! 
This question has been asked many, many times in this subreddit already.  http://www.reddit.com/r/explainlikeimfive/comments/j38ke/can_someone_explain_to_me_how_the_stock_market/
I wonder how many atheists think that *all* theists are retards with no sense of humor?
&gt;If it was just some vagrant who just happened to see you, there's no way he would have repaired the door and replaced the items.  Not necessarily. This person may really just enjoy demented mind games. If he was weird and twisted enough to go through all the trouble to flatten her two tires, rob her cell phone/keys etc. Then not rape/kill/torture her. Merely sadistically enjoy frightening her and knock her unconscious. Who's to say he wouldn't go through the trouble of putting everything back together just so she could ponder the eerie absurdity of the entire sequence of events, possibly making her consider that the utter horror that she experienced could have been in her head. Fucking with her, basically. 
Because it's primarily dominated by men for men, the Oxygen is a network dominated by women for women. Therein lies the parable. Comics are one part of a bigger industry, media. It doesn't really matter you are just picking and choosing, to fit your argument.
I completely understand where you're coming from! I am an atheist, but I grew up in the Bible belt (Texas, specifically), where sex before marriage is a HUGE taboo. My "no sex before I'm married" ideas were pretty much because I was afraid to be judged by my peers and a huge fear of getting pregnant, not because I actually thought it was wrong or I wasn't ready. So I totally get that!  I also understand wanting everything to be perfect. My first time was less than perfect (it was painful, and I bled like CRAZY. Seriously.), but I wouldn't trade it for anyone else's painless experience in the world, because Boyfriend and I really, truly love each other, and we're still together 3 years later! It can still be wonderful and special even if it's not quite perfect :-)
I'm torn on this. As someone who was born in 74 and grew up in Ipswich, I was constantly reminded of how bad flooding could be, and always checked where the 74 floods reached before even renting - let alone purchasing - property.   However, since Wivenhoe was built, various Governments lowered the official flood risk zone by quite a few metres and allowed land to be sold as prime real-estate that shouldn't have been.   That in itself shouldn't be a major issue, except that SEQ has had so many people from other states, and the focus on remembering how far the 74 floods has been intentionally removed from the environment. It's not surprising that young people, and people from other states/countries, weren't aware of how high floods could go, and this knowledge was specifically obfuscated by Governments. 
Horseshit.
If you're pear or hourglass shape, you will have trouble finding jeans that fit - I have a 70cm (28'') waist and 100cm (40'') hips, the only option for me is getting 32'' waist jeans as smaller-waisted ones aren't made to fit my ass.  If you can, get ones that fit your behind comfortably and have them tailored at the waist.  I strongly recommend bootcut jeans.
If you want some constructive criticism, I would suggest you look back at such phrases as "I miss them so" etc. You seem to try to fit rhyme so much that you backtrack your thoughts every line with an interjection rather than an observation. I understand what you're trying to say, but you're saying it in a very tired and cliched way. Try comparing your feelings of fleeting life to something that is actually fleeting. Maybe show the overgrowth surrounding the playground as you got older, showing how your sentiments changed and you lost track of time. And,, just in my opinion, it would be much better if you focused on the attempt to change your life rather than the retrospective. But that's just my two cents, whatever you do, never stop writing.
Dalai Lama ≠ Gandhi  otherwise, I don't really know what you were trying to do...
My gut feeling is that Littlefinger is out for his own gain and actually sees himself as king (or somebody with as much power) someday, while Varys honestly wants what is good for the kingdom. 
Meanwhile Politico.com calls the Tea Party the "Taliban". Hypocrite thy name is liberal.
yes.
Still looks very good on you, congrats on the figure.
You seem to be avoiding my questions and instead attempting to lecture me, dare i say this is an attempt at 'Womansplaining' or an attempt to shut-down my frank discussion of Feminist inaction on mens issues?
TvT generally
Tap water = Sodium Fluoride, Chlorine, and Chloramine.  Sodium Fluoride was used in Nazi concentration camps only on the Jewish prisoners, not the German soldiers. There are many countries who soundly reject sodium fluoride **poisoning** of their water sources.  Chlorine and Chloramine are labeled as biocides. Biocide = Life killer.  So i would rather not drink poison no matter if it's better than in other countries. Would you suspect that it's mostly American corporations that pollute other countries sources of water. If you think this is a simple issue that will be more clear with that lame satire you sir are silly.
I love him in the first three films, and in the last three. I thought he was the weakest in the fifth movie. No emotional range, and that was something rather important to the plot of that movie/book. but he was an incredibly talented kid and he has become an incredibly talented adult.
I mean, anti-virus rarely uses heuristics to detect malware... it relies almost completely on the "fingerprinting" of malware. If somebody is deliberately targeting you, they can easily send you freshly rolled malware that is undetectable by A/V. I haven't been running A/V on Windows in ~10 years and I haven't had a single virus in that period of time.  Use a properly configured firewall. Run software only from trusted sources and always verify the checksum. Keep browser plugins updated (this is the most important!) ie. PDF, Flash, Java, etc. Periodically monitor packets entering and leaving your system to better understand how the software on your machine functions and what it's "phoning home" with. Use virtual machines and sanboxing with packet monitoring tools to "test" applications you're unsure of.  In summary, anti-virus will protect your perverted grandfather from well known malware he might come across while browsing porn sites, but it's unlikely to be of any real assistance to an IT professional... especially if the malware is specifically targeting their system. Thanks for the downvotes though, guys. Keep running the Norton resource hog that was bundled with your HP laptop.
Damn sociopaths
woah. daynine is looking SHARP AS HELL
im just playing along in this subreddit .. but your storage containers sdhould be filled at this very moment.  you should be exchanging the water within them regularly. Make sure it always has fresh water in it , all the time. Waiting for a problem to come down your river, taking the clean drinking water frmo you, will be a massive problem if you wait until then to fill your storage containers. Plus there could be things like leaks or impurities within the storage containers .. you wouldnt know about thsoe unless you are testing / using them TODAY
had it been your father, he would have replied, "he may be 18 but he's hung like a 22 year old" or something not cock-blockish
Teach.  Can you find a teaching job at a community college?  I'm sure they would appreciate your experience.  If not, get your teaching credentials for high school science.  It's the one subject that we need more good teachers for. 
[Prosopagnosia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Prosopagnosia) (~face blindness)?
pigeonhole pigeonhole pigeonhole 
To be fair, being a top foreign BW player meant you were A- on ICCUP. That's not too impressive(of course they could kill my ass ezpz lemon squeezie).
Yes, for PC ... I'm a Steam Sale noob, and that was one of the first things I noticed.
Well it did the job. I did it for three weeks on a juice cleanse and my skin cleared up. Still, parts of me tighten when I look at coffee grounds.
I had a friend who had a black cat that LOVED water. He would lay in the sink and put his head under running water. He'd also jump up in the birdbath and just lay in it, water and all.
Somehow, this is much worse then the dead rat in the fan.
Would you do it if you could get a superior prosthetic? 
This makes little sense to me.
Its the episode of the half naked hottie.  She'd have taken it all off if it weren't for those meddling kids!
Seth posted a news roundup with heavy emphasis on [said picture](http://www.equestriadaily.com/2011/07/nightly-roundup-27.html), and ever since then, the influx of pictures featuring socked ponies has increased by quite a bit (Ponibooru (image uploading thing specifically for ponies) has about 4 pictures tagged "socks" in the first 30000 submissions, but after the Luna picture it has about 4 pages worth in 8000 submissions).
Statistically it's more dangerous for you to walk while drunk than it is to drive. You're very unlikely to have an accident in a car unless you are very drunk; being just as drunk and walking puts you at far more risk per-mile of getting in an accident. Plus if you're in an accident in a car it's more likely that you'll injure other people (which is not a mindset I approve of, but I think it's interesting to point out), whereas any accident as a pedestrian is likely to kill or injure you.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/SuperFreakonomics
Neither of these point to this being bullshit, actually.  the VU meter DOES match what he's monitoring - on a lot of mixers, the VU only shows what you're monitoring in the headphones. Notice at the beginning both VU meters are independent - clearly he's monitoring both decks.   Re: your second point - crossfader reverse. Very common with scratch mixers. 
It's time for the real progressives on Capitol Hill to start kicking some ass. The President sure isn't doing it. I am thinking Obama needs to switch parties in order to better reflect his actions.
You are describing the exact thing that windows does. Files in use when windows is updated get replaced at the next boot, as does the kernel in Ubuntu and other *nixes.  For a while there, Update Manager in Ubuntu 10.04 was telling me every week I needed to reboot for a kernel update. 
&gt;it's rather trivial to defend against blueflame for a fraction of their investment  Roaches deal 16 damage a shot, which means you need six roaches to one-shot hellions. Six roaches costs the same as 6 hellions (in theory, more, since gas is so vital to Zerg builds), but it only takes one split or one drop to decimate the mineral line. (it only takes two BF hellions to one-shot drones)  Also hellions are faster than roaches EVEN on creep and with gilial reconstituion. Once the hellions are dropped, drones are going to die.  tl;dr: making roaches alone does not stop this build
The problem with that is that mirrors don't perfectly reflect things. If you've ever shined a laser into a mirror you can see that a lot of of the light bounces off of the glass surface rather than the mirror surface, a nd that means that after a few reflections the light just stops.  [Endless mirrors](http://www.flickr.com/photos/caut/3346922470/) are also an example of this phenomenon, you can see that they get darker and darker because there's less and less light being reflected.
It HAS to be "Smoke on the Water".
[It's an image by Robert B. Haas. Here's some more information.](http://www.thestar.com/entertainment/books/article/897302--yes-it-s-real-flamingos-gather-in-the-formation-of-a-flamingo)
It's not, you're right. The community decides whether to join or not. This was all discussed at length before finalizing. Personally I feel it's better than doing nothing though ultimately the community will choose to accept or reject us.
Hmmmmmm do you have addons that are in your interface folder and aren't active? Try removing those if you have any. Or copy your screenshots and put them somewhere else and use the repair tool 
Perty.
&gt; I'm willing to come in here and tell you that you are wrong.   I'd say what really differentiates you from most of the people here is your refusal to form a coherent argument. Do you really think, "You're all a bunch of irrational, circlejerking teenagers!" is enough?   We're used to hearing put-downs and other abusive language. Try again. This time by showing us your brains, rather than just declaring you have them and expecting us to believe you.
Rune pages cost 6300 IP each, however that IP takes sometime to farm and Rune pages aren't as satisfying as a new champion.
Add a soundtrack to your life and perfect it.
**Please** do not link directly to Fox
I recently figured this out too.  I hate ironing and hanging upside down really helps with the wrinkles.
&gt;LOL I'm a complete retard but I won't let this guy onto it so I'll pretend I'm a troll instead!  FTFY
I don't agree with in regards to homosexuality or immigration.  I don't care if someone is gay or if immigrants move to new countries. It's xenophobic.  I do agree with him for a lot of the rest but he still walks a really fine line between being a racist and being someone who just wants honesty.
The ref didn't allow it, as it's "against the rules of the game." Didn't stop ManU from doing it with Chicharito, though, did it?
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Q9m7Vmb9amk&amp;feature=view_all&amp;list=PLFD3A1503D6F1A553&amp;index=17 This vid was posted here a couple weeks ago. Just a note that you'll look a whole lot more silly if you drop a stick at a big gig. Keep it simple. Best trick from me is taking a swig of beer while playing with one hand complete with a small fill. Gets more laughs and comments then anything else.
Why did you tell them?  Had you not read any of the threads on here about people who get kicked out for doing exactly this sort of thing?  Had you not read the FAQ?  Did this outcome surprise you?
Well it's preferrable to believe things that are true and not believe in things that are false. So no--being an atheist is still better, even if you don't hold that viewpoint for rational reasons. 
To any particle people, does \epsilon_0 depend on vacuum polarization? In other words, can we kinda get \epsilon_0 from whatever induced dipole exists from that one loop photon-electron-positron diagram, or is there more to it? I would love a nice way to think about what \epsilon_0 is and how the vacuum behaves at all like a dielectric.
The bus is sometimes extremely awkward while high. :(  It's not a huge sacrifice, just an unnecessary one. I'm going on a t-break for kicks now anyways, so you won't have to worry about me personally regardless of where you live, I've just done it many times safely and felt the need to defend the action. I don't think it's any different than 2-3 beers (for most), which would be below the legal limit.
I had it explained to me that men should put the seat down because using the toilet with the seat up constitutes 1/4 of all possible human/toilet interactions, so the likelihood of the next person needing to use the toilet for the same purpose is 25%. Therefore you should put it back down as a service to the next person who uses it.  I have also heard that you should leave the bathroom as you came to it. If the seat was down, you should put the seat back down.  But I'm a girl and I don't sit on anything without looking to make sure it isn't covered with rusty nails or something. That's just dumb.
Now, it could just be the way  her coat is in the photo, but if she's as thin as she looks, with a chest that size she must get a lot of back ache! Not perving, just a general comment (my first thought was "her poor back")
Very nice, he also looks fatter and more aggressive in your drawing. 
Haven't seen this yet. Rest stop and gas station bathrooms are disgusting. Most of the bathrooms are single person. The women's bathroom is often the cleaner one. Use it, nobody ever really notices or cares and you will feel cleaner after taking a whiz. 
everyones always known jordan was an asshole. but people forget about it because of one thing, once he started winning, he kept winning.  if lebron starts to rattle off championships, im almost certain everything will be forgiven
herp, derp, me gusta, and Y U NO can all die in a fire for all i care. other ones are quality though. EXCEPT FOR CORNY/SENTIMENTAL ONES ABOUT DEAD GRANDFATHERS AND SHIT. FUCK THAT
The first goddamn level in Super Star Wars.
Bullshiiiiite
Outlook would be AWESOME! Not that I won't use the word one, but I definitely use outlook more, and that would just really ensure I never do real work again.
[Big Man Japan](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QyXkY3wgjSE)
Did I just read a comment from William S Burroughs?
I don't understand, who is that and what is he supposed to be?
graduated from hull in 2010, its never dull in hull and its easy to (heavy yorkshire accent) pull!
Jusus...
I love her xDDD I would go bi for Marcy :D (and Karen xD)
100% correct! Thanks!
blowjorb
This made me think of the Big Ten Basketball Ref Ed Hightower. Oooooh how I hate him.   But I guess its nice that the Redskins have finally done something in the offseason.
/co/ is mainly a channel for animation/cartoon fans. They were the first ones to notice the stupid "The end of creator driven animation" article about MLPFiM, written by a misinformed tool that had not even bothered to watch the show, and sort of kick-started the current fandom...  That said, there are trolls and "did it for the lulz" types everywhere, reducing everything to below the common denominator. :(
They are interesting in that they seem more resilient to the apathy of redditors over time.  They have stuck around as popular memes much longer than most of the ones that come through reddit.  I suppose we shall see in the coming months/years whether they are a transient motif or a permanent form of expression.
The policy we use to decide whether a comment gets removed is [this one](http://www.reddit.com/r/metanarchism/comments/h8g0f/new_and_revised_antioppression_policy_take_two/). With my mod hat on, I'd rather only do mod things that are in the policy the community's agreed. Sorry that someone's being dickish; I gave them a downote for you.
As much as everyone seems to hate it, I still think parts of Armageddon were motivational, even if the science was wrong.
Your welcome and that costume is amazing! O_O
That's why it's funny.  "Oh, a new post--wait, No it--Oh, har har!"
As someone who has size 13 feet that don't fit on the stairs very well, I can attest to this sad statement. Also, being clumsy doesn't help either.
I'm actually a professional .NET developer using MVC3.  It's SOO nice to use, razor and Visual Studio 2010 are a dream to use and we're able to build sites super fast.  There's also a ton of .NET jobs around right now, I'd recommend at least trying it out :)
What an incredible waste of time.  I mean, for most people, that would be an incredible waste of time.  
Don't try to reason with them, it doesn't work. Pick-and-choose religious syndrome is often mentally debilitating. Blocks the higher brain functions, you see. So sad.
thats actually my biggest complaint with most "realistic" texture packs, from afar everything looks fuzzy and its kind of an eyesore 
The reason he says it's adderall in a different form is because they (meth and adderall) are both amphetamines. He's smoking meth...sorry :(
Exactly. Everyone has bad thoughts. Hell sometimes I have these vivid mental images of doing awful things to people when I am frustrated. And I would like to think I am a pretty nice person. The bad people are the ones that act on thoughts like that.
Well you don't want to tell people you took MDMA, that would be misleading.
http://www.reddit.com/r/badcompany2/comments/idh2e/a_guide_for_using_the_bc2_configurator_pc/
When it is a major one like 5th ave in that picture... not well. Especially that part if Pittsburgh, there are two main streets and both are 1 way going opposite directions. It is chaos around there if anything happens
No nintendo.
A simple example would be anyone with a real DMZ for hosting some sort of public or semi-public services. Many people also segment out wireless services. 
Something like this (or a cheaper knockoff) might be an option:  http://www.liberator.com/eng/product/decor-fascinator-throe/12177
genes will tell
I always thought MMA is just the latest WWF?
No. This was basically the case on an Australian program called Q &amp; A recently. There were 3 theists (2 Christians - one of whom admitted to speaking in tongues - and 1 Muslim), 1 agnostic who is better known for being a comedian and one militant feminist who is also (in her words) a humanist.   The agnostic contributed nothing except trite jokes. The humanist rarely called the theists on their bs. It was basically an hour of televangalism as none of the theists were prepared to disagree with each others' ridiculous conceptions of god, faith, the universe etc. In short, it was a giant theist circlejerk.   You need an atheist or other skeptic in the debate to continue to point out their bs. Otherwise, it's simply the blind leading the blind. Or a stunning example of the perils of groupthink. 
Pff, 15 in Sweden.  Pussies
Did you bother reading them?  They acknowledged driving while high is a danger.  Context fail.  
I'm not picking on you, but it'd be nice if people were just allowed to think certain things without having to pick a liberal or conservative label or whatever other made up thing is supposed to define you as a person.
Wow, this is the lowest point post I've made in years _AND_ it's the lowest scoring post in the thread. I must have touched a nerve. (Either that or people really hate Joel McHale.)
Pretty sweet vid.
The problem with this is that I'm not lumping together everyone who dismisses the idea of god.  I'm lumping together the assholes in this subreddit who think it is their duty to inform people that god doesn't exist.  They are just as bad as any evangelical christian.
The house of god. It's not religious, I promise.
You, my good sir, are also a genius.
*affects*
"There is no way for a child to become religious by itself, or simply by reading books, it is highly dependent on other people."  "No way"? really? would you include superstition? Because I've known some kids with some crazy superstitious thoughts, and i know of no instance where they heard it from a sensible adult. Sounds to me like you're saying it's impossible to theorize about reality without other people.
Dang, I'm heading to London for a week... wish I could make it.
I suspect you would be better off getting a professional publisher than a grad student. I don't work in this line but imagine contacts go a long way. Don't you have a book publisher you could get some good advice from?
I got it from a local dealer for a company called Details. It's a [Details Series 7](http://details-worktools.com/products/adjustables/) with a custom bevel on the front called "knife edge".
He is that!
It's cool that you are asking this - as a more experienced carpenter and woodworker, I notice spots on DIY projects that could have been finished differently for a nicer result.  So, my advice:  Make the front edge of the shelf far enough back that your decorative trim fits entirely between the wall and the vanity - the way that you are holding the trim in the picture will leave the end exposed at the front edge of the vanity and look "funny". By pulling the front of the shelf back it will be more invisible.  Your quarter round idea is good.  The poster that mentioned plywood is correct, but I also think the pine board will likely be fine. The sizes you are working with are small enough that the expansion/contraction isn't going to be significant.
EST is a label that gets slapped onto a server regardless of whether or not the actual server cluster is in the EST.  For WoW there are servers in New York with PST slapped onto them.  Those labels are only put down as a guideline to find players who play at similar times of the day as you.  I guarantee that latency won't be an issue regardless of where the server is, and with the size of a Reddit guild, you will always have people to play with.
Standard plates (1" diameter plates) come in 50lbs. Those bars are almost always shit though. The 45 pounders are Olympic plates, which I imagine has something to do with kilograms and making it easy to count for us ignorant Americans.
Exactly. I doubt I can host this for very long, and I'm only serving up a 20kb file!! Doing actual pages upon pages of stuff is a whole other story
Fuck everything about this, except the children. 
Someone who wants to give their employees a day off each week? I hear it's a pretty decent place to work.
yes we must know, and compare
Aha! See, this is exactly the sort of comment I like. A lot of people would have gone with the Titanic, but that really is too obvious.
You got my hopes up with Vancouver but atlas you are from the original one. Good luck with your store though. 
[](/aintthatsomeshit)
If you haven't tried it, try it.  (Not Drugs, but it is college, so Alcohol should be had). I started my first year at a University that perfectly fits the description you gave, and did not drink for 90% of the year.  My last weekend before Finals I went to my first party, had a little to drink (not drunk by any means) and had an awesome time.  I have since drank a lot at a lot of parties, and it's a good time.  Not drinking isn't any more responsible than drinking responsibly. Try anything twice, if it still sucks but you have given it an honest shot then move on ***Unless that anything can kill you, then you don't have to try it
Doctor, Footballer, Game Developer, Pilot, Cartoonist ( i think that's what they are called), tried my hand at acting around that time as well. Those are the only ones i can remember.
ee hand timing
Pepetual is a bit of an overstatement considering White-ra has been at 1 MLG this year. 
A subreddit for the total war already exists: [/r/totalwar](http://www.reddit.com/r/totalwar).  I'm sure you'll be abel to find many other TW lovers (such as myself) there. 
Glass or two of chocolate milk always hits the spot after a long ride.
full of fucking win
http://lmgtfy.com/?q=how+to+look+better
Well, this is much better than Superman 64.
I sincerely doubt it. Ft. Irwin is where the National Training Center is based, so it's likely those rifles were used as OpFor weapons and affixed with Blank Firing Adapters and fired with blanks in them for countless operations. I wouldn't be surprised if they're the shittiest rifles ever stolen.  Could be wrong though, don't quote me on that, speculation.
/badpokerface
I've heard some negative things about Intel, like how you have to pay extra for functionality in chips you already own? Shit like that makes me nauseous but I'm looking for performance and if that's what Intel has over AMD, I'll go with it. Then again, I'm sure there are AMD cards that have better specs than the Intel i5? Would I be able to afford those?
As a better alternative, I'd suggest going to a Mormon church. I hear the girls there will drop their pants for anyone at all.
still LOLing... 
Herp.
I really want to ask her out but I don't know how. She's simply beautiful, inside and out. The kindest, sweetest girl I've seen. Her smile makes my day and talking with her just elates me. I just want to have one date. If it fails and doesn't work out, that's fine with me, but just a chance to be with her in some romantic/friendly setting would be enough to make me the happiest guy. I just don't know what to say. She's the only girl I've ever asked out, and although she said no last time because she had a boyfriend, I feel like she'd say yes, at least, this time. WHY DO I HAVE TO BE SO SHY. FFFFFFFFFFFFFFFFUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUU 
It sickens me, period!
Do you have pictures of your prototypes? It would definitely help drive interest..
Yeah, that was really the only thing I didn't like in the movie. Slytherins aren't cut and dry like that--not ALL of them are evil. If you look around, I didn't see a single Slytherin Hogwarts student fighting Voldemort, which is unrealistic--if Draco and Crabbe and Goyle were able to sneak out, some others definitely did, for one side or the other.
What jobs have you been looking for?  One thing they don't tell you when you go to grad school is that the degree will open doors for you.... but it will also slam the door shut on a lot of jobs that you will then seem overqualified.
FOKKEN
My best friend is the same way.  She doesn't like it when a beard is growing in because she says it hurts to kiss her SO.  
Hot and cold exists, as they are words describing what temperature something have in comparison with our bodies (usually). If we are talking about heat, then there is no hot *or* cold, just different amount of heat.
Thanks! I'll look around, but it was hard to even find the one.  I always used to put my hair up.  
*Note: I work at Michael's*...  When you go on the Michael's website you can order through *some* of the vendors that supply the store.  If you can't order through the vendor, you can get the brand name and *sometimes* order it directly through them as well.  Like you (wolfpacks) said though, a lot of sellers/vendors are willing to work with the customers, especially for bulk items.  I don't believe Michael's sells them in bulk, but it doesn't hurt to check the website just to make sure.  Good luck!
I have knowen half of the list and I am in my mid-40's
Holy shit, that was awesome.  Never even heard of this guy before.
You in austin? Lets get baked ^_^
Meditation benefits you in the immediate sense anyway - so practicing compassion and mindfulness isn't a waste of time even now.  You are always growing more compassionate and mindful anyway - think of all the benefits you have of being older and more respected.  Also, a side effect of compassion is that you want to create a better world for your children, or just everyone that comes after you.  Knowing you will have made the world a better place in the future will ease your mind now.
Been a huge fan since Magic Potion came out. Such a great sound.
Why?
A mention of weight and iNcontroL. Hrm..
&gt;It will be cheaper to simply add some headlight fluid avaliable at any auto parts store.  You can also find it online, but you'll have to download some RAM to access the sites.
MS Project ? Will be difficult I guess.
I prefer to use my wit and charm to dissuade errant hobos. 
You're lucky she didn't find the rest of your Downloads folder.
Ironically I just got back from a leave and will be going on another soon. Does that mean I no longer have chest access? :(   Anyway Sorry I haven't been on much, life is busy. Ill try to get on in a couple days,   Long Live Nerdia!
My dying Bride is both apparently. Go figure.
As a transgender, do you prefer to socially hangout with men or women? Also, from your experiences as an activist have you noticed whether or not rape is common among transgendered? Oh, and another one, when you grew up have you ever felt like a "freak" or "cursed" or an outcast in anyway? Did you ever blame being transgendered for your rape? Sorry about all the questions, just really really curious as I have a friend similar to you who I've always been afraid to ask these questions to. 
LOL, I worked at a bank right after high school (about 1999) and I used to cash my paycheck in all $2 bills.  The tellers would love me because they didn't have to count stacks of them.  I got weird looks and "is this real?" everywhere I went. LOL
I may be lazy, but I'll never sink to this level. 
Why don't you try it for yourself?
 Way to post something that people don't understand, and then BM them for not understanding it. Downvote for you, sir.
Each time I see it on the front page it's delicious karma whoring
[](/wtf)
try it and see.  It doesn't cost anything.  Give it a shot and post your results.
Yes.
I support keeping marijuana illegal ; it creates a lot of jobs for Canadians.  edit: You're downvoting an unpopular opinion in an unpopular opinion thread? Really? 
The second amendment exists for a reason.
this
sweet
Ok
idi bre u pizdu materinu... ;)
Nice one!  But..your opponent missed the back rank mate when you moved the rook to e1 on move 17!  Ouch.  Watch out for that, man.  I've lost quite a few to that (and won more than a few too ;) ).
If you're a journalist and want to lose your job quicker than anything else, keep fucking up small shit like names. It's tiny shit people notice, and it's those kind of mistakes that really lower the esteem of an event to people still on the fence.
Hopefully a dead one.
Puff Daddy/P.Diddy/Diddy Dirty Money. Cause we would be so rich. And I could have a sweet name Like Mxy Plxy Money. But with my real name in there instead.
Then there are people who are pseudo defending math creativity i.e. it only exists in higher level math.  Yet, elementary number theory and combinatorics  are very creative.  In fact, I posit that solutions to elementary problems are some of the most creative in all of mathematics due to the limited range of available tools. 
We've been dating about a month but we're both pretty experienced to begin with. I nearly lost my virginity in my first serious relationship at 15 as well but we decided to wait because it seemed too young (even though we ended up dating for 2 years).  I've had about 6 relationships, 2 serious ones, and done everything multiple times except have sex.  I really trust this guy and I'm actually a little worried that if I don't take advantage of this time with this guy I really trust and care about, that I might throw it away recklessly.
Terminal Velocityyyyyy :3 !
I got to downvote you twice!
Happy birthday brother Ent, mine is tomorrow!  That was suppose to attach to the other Ent. Lol.
"Yeah, well, you know, that's just, like, your opinion, man."
Reminds me of Juan in a Million in Austin, which, by the way, makes the best hangover food known to mankind.
I would guess map control. Easy to harass, possibility of getting some skilled or lucky shots against a mineral line also come in handy. But mostly map control, speed, control of the towers and such. 
Yeah, but I don't see any Ramen noodles on the ingredients list.
dont...understand..
Perfect combo for a beginner, or anyone. 
ah ja man thanks
Because traits that made it more able to live with its surrounds were naturally selected and diverged from the original.  An easy way to understand this is to look at dogs.  Humans short cut evolution by breeding dogs that had favourable traits, eg retrieving, friendliness, protecting, carrying loads, size etc. 
I was kinda rocking back and forth, tapping my fingers, and I just froze when I read that last sentence. I am so sorry for you.....
finally a place to talk about CoD games
Use hot water or ice and cold water, it smooths out your hits incredibly. You should not be taking hard hits with a bong, otherwise you're doing it wrong.
Are you using all four monitors from the same graphics card? In that case: Have I understood correctly that I would need to connect at least two of the monitors through Displayport? I lost my manual, and I haven't manage to google up anything conclusive.
You have to be kidding...I mean seriously, game freak and nintendo COMPLETELY intended to make this a game that could be played for fun AND competitively...I legitimately can't see how you can even make that argument if you've ever seen a pokedex website, forum, or anything in regards to the game at all.
Baylor? Oh, you poor, poor bastard.
holy shit, does this mean I'll be able to see the millions of imgur posts at work tomorrow?  Is there a version of this that only has the domain filter bypass feature.  I like how you just click on an imgur link and it pops up.  I work alone, so the Office skin is unnecessary.  Thanks though!  this must have taken a lot of time.
http://www.facebook.com/photo.php?fbid=2092873755667&amp;set=a.1514869145913.2076654.1059970283&amp;type=1
Just stare at a still reference point outside the rocking boat so your eyes can reassure your brain that its balance is not out of whack.  For example, stare at the stars, moon, land, or clouds.  Don't stare at the sun though; it may give you some other problems...
That wasp sounds a lot like my ex-girlfriend. 
im so bad at doing myself. tips?! i usually end up falling asleep...
The legendary Yao face. Guy on the right. Found it.
Sorry to hear about that, man.
All of that makes sense, except for this part:  &gt; You have to remember, in a competitive health care system without government intervention and regulation hospital visits would be relatively cheap, insurance would be cheap and uninsured people could still be covered for emergencies.  I guess perhaps where I am having difficulty is with the concept of a competitive health care system. I feel like one of the failures of the American system is the lack of competition between private insurers and healthcare providers. The response "Well, get the government out, and competition will take over!" seems like an overly simplistic response. No one I know really shops around for healthcare insurance, you basically take whatever you are given through your employer. When you are in an emergency, it's not easy to shop around first.  Free market competition makes alot of sense for cell phones or cars, which are easy for me to compare head to head. In the case of healthcare, on the other hand, there seems to be a concerted effort to make it's delivery (via public or private methods) convoluted and difficult to compare. If I extend your line of reasoning, it would seem that without government intervention or regulation, we just have to hope for a Joe Schmoe to come up with a better method of healthcare delivery which is much more suitable to direct competition, and hope that the existing healthcare industry competes fairly with Joe Schmoe.
This was pretty much me and my dad, only he would smoke once or twice a year. He would give me money to buy it as long as I would stay home and go top shelf because he wanted to smell a good aroma from time to time. 
Follow the advice given [here](http://redd.it/j48de).
I think you should wait until they make a new version of the 3DS, which should be coming out in about a year or two. By that point all the kinks with the system will have been smoothed out and the game will have a much larger library for you to mess around with.
FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: FWD: HEY! LISTEN!
Good man! Apart from that, nom nom :D
Alaska and the Yukon should be included in "Canada", not Cascadia. Makes more sense ideologically. Besides that, I think this would be absolutely perfect, and dream of a time when I could see this implemented.  
The one fucking night I didn't have my blade. &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Any information on this place?
i love how the only Jets fan to respond picks NE to finish behind the Jets, much worse than last year.  and for the record, i didn't downvote him
I agree; factories, reactors, blueflame, and medivacs don't cost any gas.
the goon at the end tought it was a crack pipe!
&gt;Do Muslims see this constitution as god-give or something good that Muhammad did?  It's both actually. God's commands are contained in the Quran. Muhammad's role as the messenger was to set an example for Muslims. In essence, Quran says *what*, while Muhammad demonstrated *how*.  &gt;Is Muhammad seen as infallible?  No. Emphatically no, Muhammad himself has several quotations denying any infallibility. He was very clear that he was merely a human being. He is known to say that he was not even sure how favourably he will be judged before God once he died. There is a famous event from the battle of Bad'r, when Muhammad formed the ranks to face the enemy, one of the soldiers asked him if the ranks were formed by divine instruction or of his own volition. When Muhammad replied it was of his own volition, the soldier suggested that the entire setup be changed, and Muhammad gladly accepted the new plan. Had he been infallible, it would have been sacrilege to even question his battle plan.  &gt;Do you feel this constitution has been badly implemented where people have tried? Are there a lot of disagreement about interpretation about this?  This is a very complex issue. Islamic tradition for the most part died and was permanently lost after the [Mongol invasion](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Siege_of_Baghdad_\(1258\)). Read the article to gauge the extent of intellectual and historic destruction. After that colonial exploitation (Ottomans, British, and French) crushed any chance of recovery and revival. In the absence of education the Muslim world plunged into a dark age, where outsiders became synonymous with enemies, thus ending possibilities of secularism. So long as this distrust exists, a secular Islamic state will be very difficult to establish and very unstable.  [Here](http://www.megavideo.com/?v=AR5TOJJW) is a very recent documentary (episode 2 of 3) made by BBC on the life of Muhammad. At around the 14:00 mark they start discussing the Migration to Medina and the establishment of the Islamic state in Medina. They show points of view from several different Arab and non-Arab sects Christian, Jewish, independent scholars. I would suggest watching.  Edit: The constitution part actually starts at 25:00.
At least I actually got some girls, lol. But apparently I'm the spittin' image of Bill Clinton. http://i.imgur.com/9dZu3.jpg
Gonna stop talking now.
Thanks!
&gt; Commiseration and advice from women is valuable too, you know. I do not see the point of making this a divisive gender issue.  As a woman on the men's rights board, I can assure you this is a divisive gender issue. Have you ever heard of a man trying to pull this kind of shit on a woman? No, because no cop is going to even take the call.
I see guys like Melendez moving into the UFC, and guys like Elliot Marshal moving down to strikeforce.  Maybe strikeforce will become a place for guys with potential (but on loosing streaks) to gain some more experience before the big show.
Am I the only one not physically acting out these memes?  *edit: upvote for making me laugh, btw. I always laugh when people get not-too-seriously hurt.
That is the plan
Look into getting a good money clip to hold your bills tightly. I'm from the US but I  lived over in eastbourne for a little and would play a lot over at the grosvenor in brighton, and occasionally train up to london to go to the victoria or the empire. I know what you mean with the walking over there. To get to the one in brighton I had to walk 2 miles to the train in eastbourne then all the way down to the pier which was a lil ways. If you don't have a jacket wear some pants with good deep pockets and just make sure you moneys secure. Good luck at the tables.
The Backburner is the greatest flamethrower.   What's that you say? Not helping the team? The Backburner succeeds in being contributive by killing the other team.
I mean seriously, you do realize you're on reddit right? The site with rage comics and general internet nerdiness/silliness? Or perhaps you're such a serious, super hxc anarchist that your sense of humor is on par with Karl Marx at a Ron Paul rally. That's fine, you don't have to laugh. Downvote it, post about how it is dumb, how I'm a lazy prole for typing "lol" instead of "laughing out loud," how my lack of irony obviously prohibits me from the hipster-chique anarchy club. But saying I should be put to death, even if meant as a joke, is not a good idea.
I would totally be down for some chipotle right about now. Come to Michigan and I'll take you out.
If it wasn't reality it'd almost be comedy gold!
When you smash the drink against the back of a car window.
Love this comic! But don't forget Guideline number 4:  *"When what you're looking for is found, please edit the text of your post to reflect the answer or reply to the correct comment and include the word SOLVED."*
Yes.  I was trying to imply their importance (if DNA codes for them, obviously they do important things), but I suppose it would have been better to state it explicitly.  Thank you.
now she's goddamn beautiful.
Don't create the site on the live server. Create it on your pc with a local copy of wordpress. When you are done. Install wordpress on the server and upload your new theme.  If you really want to create it on the live server, install wordpress in a subdirectory.
Up until they realize that people have gotten wind of this and fix it so the blue shells hit no matter what in the next game.
Wow, you're GF sounds like me and I happen to be diagnosed with bipolar. I just left my last GF and it took seven months and some medication before I could even see the hole that I was in. I lived in isolation and pushed my ex beyond my reach. After all that pain, she has finally moved on and now I suffer as I reflect upon my loss. I just made a post on here about it the other day.  I would recommend that you get her to see a psychiatrist who could analyze her for any conditions. A professional could also help you both detect patterns of behaviors and ways to make things better together. I'm not saying that she is bi-polar but whatever she is suffering from, will require a great deal of commitment and understanding from you. If you are up to the challenge, and can get her to go and place effort into this, you will hopefully have a rewarding relationship.  Since I started my medication, I have lost about 30lbs. Some medication may increase weight, but I've made a lot of improvements to my life. I changed my diet, started to exercise, and really have a thrill to succeed.   If you think that this is too much, I don't think anyone will think less of you for walking out. Hopefully, you two will remain friends and you can continue to help her as she seeks treatment. Remember, treatment for any condition will never work if she isn't committed to getting help. I wish you both the best of luck!
That was not "VERY FUNNY".
Tell her that you feel that inside every fat woman, there's a thin woman trying to get out, and you've decided to date an escapee.
To be fair, that bug was fixed a long time before Heimer stopped winning games. Later, he just won games with his ridiculous pushing power. His turrets were stronger, and his grenades damaged towers. You could just stand there in your little bubble of functional invulnerability (since running in turret range would mean nearly instant death at any level below 12) and nade their tower down little by little. There was basically no counter to this that didn't involve putting far more resources in that lane than the Heimer team needed to (on the order of 3v1 to really uproot him), putting the other lanes at a disadvantage as well. Basically it was like old Tryn (time limit on the game), but worse, since the time limit was about 15 minutes to inhib tower down in whatever lane Heimer focused. Had to win before that (or just outplay the Heimer team entirely) or it was all over.
What conflicts do you imagine arising, and between whom?
Hey Mark are you listening? I got 200k hits in less than 6 hours. That's from the movie right?
PROTIP: GETTING ASSHURT ABOUT THINGS LIKE TRAFFIC SHOULD HIGHLIGHT JUST HOW UNFULFILLED AND PETULANT YOU HAVE BECOME. HAVE A NICE DAY.
This, plus heavy cream, coconut oil, olive oil.
Can some one explain how a digitally controlled solenoid shower valve and it's mechanical analog work?
Why don't you write a letter to ATI or some of the game developers.
fuck memes
The Yogscast are going to be overjoyed
woahhh thats so cool i lived in fairfax my freshman year (CMU)!!!!
It seems like most the local ents around here want nothing to do with another ent that cant eat a pound of chocolate and not gain a pound from it =/ 
I really have mixed feelings on the whole high school kids smoking weed. 
it's sexy
Yikes, see I had a feeling I was too harsh. Firstly, even a 1 has natural beauty (albeit, not too much of it). Secondly, a 5 and half or 6 is above average, as I made great pains to explain. A 5 is average. You are above average; thus, you're kinda cute. I suppose I wasn't very helpful and just bashed away, so I'm sorry if it upset you or anything, but I was just trying to be honest.
no gun show, no ass. i am disappoint...
and then they go on vacation but their boat sinks.
Hello sober me
Not mutually exclusive.
There was a time when i added non-steam games to steam and named them things like "Duke Nukem Forever alpha v0.417... of course, I can't do that anymore, because now its not funny, just sad.
I wasn't intoxicated when it happened, but I quickly became so immediately after.
Yeah, he kind of looks like a starving vampire hobo in that pic, more than usual, I mean. 
SHES SO HAWT! PLEASE POST MORE AND KEEP US UPDATED!
Great show. I got to meet Rie Kugimiya and Horie Yui at anime expo last year for the promotion. Great show, great voices, and killer animation. I recommend it to people who don't even watch romances much. 
I'm not telling you *what* to do. I'm telling you you're a fucking idiot.
I almost got into a fight with three ridiculously trashy teenage girls. I was walking into a mall, post work out, and had a pair of shorts on and it was cold. They were like "why is that girl wearing shorts?" and the other replied with "I dunno she is a white girl, they are crazy." (I am not white, and the girl that said it was about two hundred pounds with blonde greasy hair and blue eyes)-perfectly audible for me to hear, and I was like "because I just got done working out" - in a very bitch tone. They began screaming obscenities at me. I hate teenagers especially ghetto bitch trash. 
Get the premium app.
Also America
[](/harpdarp) Oh, sorry, I forgot about all of those people down in South America. Why is it even called America if it's not part of the United States? 
You're fucking delusional. 
You need to review your history. [Check out a shot of Fenway Park's "Green Monster" in *1914*](http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/3/35/Green_Monster_1914.jpg)
I do best as Alistar, but Shen is my favorite to play. Using Teleport and Fortify and you're pretty much Mr. Map Defender.
Even in his 4th place victory he was still only 4-3 against some very weak competition. 
Son, one day you will hit 500 hours, and getting those last 30 pesky achievements will feel like christmas.
The second one from the left always reminded me of Buzz Lightyear. 
At *certain* levels. Not necessarily at greater levels.
the only thing that really worried me was the ether
Disc golf, what about some roller hockey? :)  I have a feeling that if we meet IRL we would get a long well. Haha.
If you deny your urges, they TOTALLY DISAPPEAR. Because SHUT UP THAT'S WHY.
[I cleaned up your cherished family photo](http://i.imgur.com/YrPAr.png)   Edit: it was super low res, so it was hard to keep the details. 
Commence trouser soiling.
[www.sheldonbrown.com](http://sheldonbrown.com/fixed-conversion.html)  Read every inch of that website and then re-ask. I think you are confused.
You won't have time to 'yuck', you'll be dead.
You forgot "I'm short".
That's ok, they probably wouldn't be able to operate their registers without silicon anyway.
Try to expand yourself farther back and view your ancestors lives, or forward down the lines of the distant future.  Only then can you begin the Golden Path.
Just drying out the cats.
Really? I was lollin up a storm.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CTNhCzmUjlw ?   Season 5, episode 13   Edit: I think I misread what you were looking for. Is it at least those two guys, even if its not that scene?
In the midwest, we Ichthys use [Wisconsin Fish Identification Database](http://wiscfish.org/fishid/) It is excellent.
Im right about your age. As for you concern with open-mindedness, I do not think anywhere in the south is a good place for you. Seriously, I live in Louisiana and I go to a boarding school in New England, and for some reason I do not like being around homosexual guys (No offense). I think it was the way that I was brought up in my neighborhood, school, etc. But, I notice many people in New England and the north have a higher tendency to accept homosexual guys.
I agree, too Disney.
Wow, that's... Wow.
RAmen!
Mastering has little to do with the medium. You can brickwall recordings on vinyl or digital - doesn't matter.  See [this](http://www.moocowproductions.org/wp-content/uploads/2011/07/Screen-Shot-2011-07-21-at-9.53.04-PM.png). Notice how the digital copy (top) often peaks all the way up to 0 dB. The vinyl version does have peaks, but they aren't all at 0 dB.  That's a dynamic range compression at work on the digital copy and has nothing to do with the medium. The mastering engineer for the digital copy decided that it needed to be obnoxiously loud and, in that, he succeeded. But the end result is that the audio almost sounds distorted and un-natural.  Hence why my vinyl copy, regardless of technical limitations of either format, sounds better.  But it's subjective *shrug*. If you like loud, brickwalled, recordings than you would likely prefer the digital. And, to be fair, you can hear everything clearly in the digital version - but it's more like all the instruments are screaming at you.  In the end, I may not be able to convince you, but it doesn't matter. I like I said, it's all subjective.  Based upon the above I will continue, to disagree that a CD rip will always sound better than a vinyl one.
The real reason i decided to drop my phd scholarship and get a stable job. I'm only 26 but I feel like i made too many sacrifices already. I couldn't be happier now :)
Check out POTN - or more specifically, the photo sharing section  http://photography-on-the.net/forum/
[](/wayevil "U LIED")
Never read the book, though I do believe they showed us the [film](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0053804/) back in high school.
Actually this is at a different angle and if you notice at the top it says submitted 19 DAYS ago while this was 5 hours ago. So it looks like THAT guy edited it or found a different pic, or went there and took his own picture.
"Id rather die while Im livin than live while Im dead" - Jimmy Buffett
It doesn't, it just helps him remember to get drunk on Thursday
I recommend reading [this .pdf file](http://assets.opencrs.com/rpts/RL31967_20100128.pdf) (the link triggers a 1.1MB download), which gives the history and theory of having a debt limit.  The current brouhaha has little to do with the debt limit. The tea baggers claim to want to limit government spending without raising taxes. They have refused to vote on plans to raise the debt ceiling unless the plans include spending reductions, amendments to require balance budgets, and other minutiae which have nothing to do with the debt ceiling.   In the article I link to, the authors refer to "the President" in certain years, without identifying the person holding the office. Let me point out that Clinton was President from 1993 to 2001, at which time there was a budge surplus as stated in more detail in the article. From 2001 to 2009, when the deficits began to grow. These deficits seem to have resulted from the Bush tax cuts and the two wars, which were run "off the books" (which is to say without specific funding, just spending the money).  Now, for some reason, a deficit is a horror story for the Republicans and is not to be allowed. No reason has been expressed for this change in attitude toward the deficit now that Obama is in office. Because of their opposition to "big government" and deficits, tea baggers will not vote for raising the debt ceiling unless there are unrelated strings attached.  But read the article and draw your own conclusions.
so then i take it then your damage modifier and soak damage skill is off the charts, correct?
Yeah but no worries about bears gettin' yer bacon. 
Movies: Beerfest, Super Troopers  TV Show: Spongebob Squarepants, King of the Hill, That 70's Show  Songs: Ludacris - Blueberry Yum Yum, Afro Man - Because I got High
You don't have a neurological disorder. You're just boring. And found an affectation that keeps your brain busy. Get a hobby. 
Oh and I probably should add that this responsibility is going to be yours as an enlisted man too, especially when you become an NCO.  It's part of what makes military leadership so challenging. 
moms lookin good
ANU!
Comcast - Value (high speeds, low price)  Uverse - low speed, for the same tier price.  -----  If you can deal with Comcast's shit CS, do it, if not, go Uverse
I was thinking the same thing while cutting pineapple at work the other day!
Does Entsy still exist?  Edit: Yes it does... woohoo!
I'm saving this nugget for when I find some douche shoulder surfing me.
[Lo mismo pero en imgur para los que usamos hover zoom](http://imgur.com/V7h6x)
Fap to it. 
No man. It's supported by the facts. The majority of TvTs are won by a Terran. So unfair.
Holy god, creepy *and* condescending! I love it!
Just a word of warning, I'm much more knowledgeable about early/mid 20th century Asian conflict. You might want to bow out of this gracefully, especially since this is not the thread for that discussion.
[Not at all](http://fireflychinese.kevinsullivansite.net/episode1.html#se1)
I started with after school doing work experience which quickly turned into an after school job which then turned into a full time job 10 years later and no paper under my belt I can get the position with most lvl 2 systems/network admin but I really need to start getting some certs to go much further.
I posted this elsewhere, but since it's not hosted on reddit.com, no :P
The picture was in case she tried lying. And you don't have to be an asshole. Let other people try to have their relationships instead of putting them down.
When Bran first sees through the Weirwood at Winterfell, and sees it's past and history. Something about that really got to me. I got chills. 
Good stuff Samineru.
Possibly one of the Hotel Cafe recordings maybe? If I recall, that's the one where he sings the original lyrics to Waiting on the World to Change but says that Steve Jordan said they weren't accurate so he had to change it.
Moderation isn't something you can just do, it's a skill that you have to develop.   I've found, for myself that an online calorie/exercise counter is the best way to do this. Knowing what you put in your body is essential to knowing when you can abuse it a little bit. If you had a good week, eat something fatty or something sugary. Don't feel guilt, just start the next day fresh and repair the damage.   Honestly, if you have a cheat day once a week, it's not even going to slow you down.   Just stop hating yourself. Stop demonizing the food. Maybe cheating once in a while will get you to your goal in 2 years rather than 1, but at least you didn't hate yourself the whole time.   Trying to get thin is your enemy. Just try to be healthy, both inside and out.
I cry your pardon.
What is your price range? Do you want a pump, semi-auto, or other?  Mossberg 930SPX is a pretty sweet shotgun worth considering. It's a semi-auto in the $600 range. It will be my next acquisition. I also have a Mossberg Persuader, which is a nice pump and can be had for under $400.  If you're looking for something on the cheap, check some police trade-ins. You can find Remington 870's with some finish wear and scuffing for under $300.  If you want to start an heirloom collection and money isn't an option, considering Benelli or FN Herstal. They make very nice semi-auto shotguns in the $1000+ range.
I do agree with you that every viewpoint has a right to be spoken. But the free speech moral imperative goes too far if you expect everybody to sift through every piece of information. They aren't able to, and they don't want to. That is why they browse Reddit, why they read newspapers and use other aggregators.  But I don't think I can continue this discussion right now, I'm too tired, and anyway I'm getting downvoted so why bother ;)
I generally believe any water tank should be replaced after 10 years, as the risk of an expensive leak becomes large.  But then the one that came with the house I now own lasted for 23 years, so go figure.  By the way, some people believe flushing the gunk out of a water heater should be done annually, like replacing smoke detector batteries.  These occasions also always make me think whole-house sediment filters are a good idea.  And related to this, if you're going to replace the heater, I suggest mounting it on something at least a few inches high (I use a pressure-treated 4"x4"x8', cut into 3 pieces) to make draining it easier.
Paternalist bullshit
As former dormee and now apartment dweller, I can say that the Commons is actually pretty good food, on the whole. The big problem is that eating there every day can get old, fast, especially for people who choose to eat the same thing every day. Mix it up, try new things, and you will be much happier with the selection in the long run. The quality of food offered has improved dramatically in the last several years.  If you have suggestions for the commons, please give them to Joe. The Commons is always looking for new things to try and ways to improve the quality of dining. Just keep in mind that new ideas can take a while to implement.
Exactly
Malkovich Malkovich Malkovich Malovich. Malkovich Malkovich? Malcovich.
Love it.  My fiance has a beard and it's glorious.
Nobody said Okami? I am disappointed.
No upvote for photo. Give source
Please, ignore every other point I made, exactly as I was saying. Instead of focusing on the gist of message you pick one point, albeit an important one, to reply to. That being said, Silwan is practically in the west bank, I worked with Palestinians every day of those three months. I've spent time in Ashqelon as well, right outside of Gaza. I too know, I'm sure, many more people than you do that live in these areas. I can assure you that the situations in Gaza and the West Bank could be infinitely worse if not for the restraint and humanitarian inclinations of the Israeli government. The situation is undeniably unfortunate, and the multifaceted nature of Israeli political society prevents an easy negotiation with the Palestinians, but it is no way in the Israelis' interests or minds to continue this business of segregation, second class citizenship, and struggle. This all being said, and realizing that the matter is not as simple as ceding all 1967 demarcated land to the Palestinians, being that there are cities and homes built there already (illegally of course, but homes none the less. to evict them against their will would be only a repetition of the original ousting of the Palestinians. if you support such an eye for an eye, violent inhumane act for violent inhumane act mentality, then we are on different pages and will not be able to discuss this further). It is in the interest of both parties to settle so that both are satisfied. It would be unjust to, under the claims of a more than 40 year old demarcation, cede all developed Israeli land to Palestinians. Some compromise must be made, that is certain, and what it is I am no closer to understanding than you. But you must understand that the situation between the Palestinians and Israelis is not one of racial or religious hatred, but a tragic struggle sown in great heartache on both sides. 
And cash discounts are legal, whereas credit card usage fees are not.
Kindergar*t*en is 5-6.  Preschool is early 5 and under.
Actually Gyarados can learn ONE flying move: Bounce.
holy shit.  this explains everything
[Just one question](http://i.imgur.com/hrzWw.png).
If it's on the front page, then you can only blame the members of reddit itself for voting it up, and if their tastes suck so much, why are you still here?  (Serious question.  Reddit's tastes do suck and I'm not sure why I'm still here.)
Thanks to fan patches and mods it's more finished. more amazing.
Perogies are Polish, right?
Works great for me too.
Tyler did **NOT** go 1-7. He went through the entire upper bracket. 
Beard.  BEARD.
Thank you for your good work!
good thread
You make a very excellent point, it's pretty much deferred taxation. 
*Obvious Troll*
How solid is it? Is it made out of metal or is it like a plastic ornament? I'm thinking about buying one but these resale prices are so inflated!
I thought it was cancelled? That would mean that the last episode insinuated that the humans lost or stand no chance. Why are they considered bad? Seems that the V are seeking survival. Too bad for humans, but I'm not sure how the V are the bad ones.
many keyloggers do nothing for managing mouseclicks, and even if they do, most script kiddies are way too fucking stupid to read them.  so lets say your username is gamechief (at gmail) and your password is x1y2z3a4, you type in the wrong order into the username and password boxes... me (click)ga (click)ie (click)ch (click)f.  then password 1234 (click)x (click)y (click)z (click)a.  it's not foolproof, but it's the only way to log in when you absolutely need to, but expect the box to be fucked.
Tasty Coma Wife.
it was a joke guies, sheesh
sorry, that's not how math works. Then the books themselves are 'negligible' because it's only 16 books.
Already created, linked in the sidebar. Sorry, looks like yours might go to waste (can you modify the name of your league? Might work for another subreddit or sub-group - I know /r/LiverpoolFC set up its own league as well).  There was also another one created a couple days ago on Yahoo, you can probably search for it. 
yeah... dwarves can and will go quite insane when the lose a loved one.
Yes, but SC2 isn't BW.
Just read the entire chat log, I agree with you but seriously the guys you were playing against weren't even that bad, if anything they were at least humorous.  I have no idea what your PSR is, but try playing in the 1600 MMR bracket, it's worse than the 1400/1500's, everyone thinks they're top shit.
ME TOO! And I mistakenly mentioned this once to some guy friends and have yet to live it down
I always thought the 2nd structure looked like some kinda robot walking, and you would live in its head
self-righteous suicide
Great gaming developers - yeah, Apple already has plenty, especially with big console-heavy developers like EA also developing for iOS, but it certainly wouldn't hurt.   At the moment, [Apple is basically Nintendo's biggest competition](http://www.tuaw.com/2010/05/10/nintendo-apple-is-enemy-of-the-future/), and Nintendo is in a pretty bad position with their 3DS failure, so I wouldn't see why Apple would necessarily want to buy them when they're [growing faster than them in gaming](http://www.appleinsider.com/articles/11/07/27/electronic_arts_apple_ipad_our_fastest_growing_platform_for_gaming.html) anyway.  Nintendo still stands pretty well as it is, but an acquisition by Apple would be pretty fantastic for the iPhone, especially the iPad, and perhaps even the Apple TV.  I seriously doubt it will ever happen, but it would be pretty cool.
I live down the street, otherwise I wouldn't have this mostly useless trivia at my fingertips.
No, because you would be writing off those in the bible belt to live in a theocracy. I do not want to have to immigrate when I eventually am able to get out of here.
I'm originally from Mexico and I wouldn't drive in Mexico any more. Fly in to your destination. 
I love how he says "I'm so excited" in the most unexcited way possible. 
Well, actually…
I was wondering if their was any redditors kicking around who didn't hate Bill O'Reilly. Guess there are. Good for you for sticking to your opinions.
actually, you dont care
When I lived in Austin, Tx, it would get to 110°F [44°C] with a humidity of 85%. It felt like 125°F [52°C]. On top of that, I had to wear a 100% wool marching uniform. 'Twas crappy.
I had smokes in Ottawa before I saw it in Toronto. I can confirm, as a French Canadian, that it is fantastic.
I really hope that you carried on running for atleast a week before realising you were actually Johnny
Stately Wayne Manor is stately. 
Man, if a dog named after a drink hasn't got a soul, this planet needs management
That is an old article, and the F2P game Valve turned out to be working on was TF2. They hardly make any money off of TF2 as it is, it makes absolutely no sense business-wise to buy the rights to DOTA and release it for free.
Omfg. Really? Bustin' out the 'noob', huh. 
What a fucking whore.
I can confirm that going to college and telling everyone who thought you couldn't is the best feeling in the world. Once I finish up my law degree I'm flying back and walking right into my old high school so I can show it right to their faces. Funny thing is that most of what would have been my graduating class didn't end up going to college, let alone going to an out of state school.  I understand you're reasoning in leaving high school, it's kind of similar to my reasoning. Sometime school is the least of your concerns, people don't always understand that.
You, sir, are brilliant. 
He is a [douche](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tEMtcZ1C7No) though.  Also, found the [dive](http://www.slate.com/content/slate/blogs/browbeat/2010/06/17/dive_of_the_day_uruguay_s_luis_suarez.html).  Edit: Another [dive](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kBJyG2omGqc&amp;feature=player_embedded#at=34). Also found [this](http://www.vanmersbergen.com/schwalbe/# "Ctrl+F Suarez and enjoy.") interesting site. Google can work wonders.
Real job out of college 30k too.
Mediocre backup in Vince Young FTFY
Very nice, looks cool. Do you think you will get the urge to draw something on the other half now?
I do this a lot as spy. Take an enemey teleporter, step backwards, start swinging. I woudl love to see three other classes such as scout swinging like mad to hit the enemy.
Drawing legendaries?  You've got my attention...
Oh sure.  It's perfectly normal.  You probably have a reason but don't recognize it yet.  Maybe you don't like how they speak, what they wore, or what movies/sports they play.  There's a reason though.  Take Amy Winehouse.  People were raging on her pretty hard -- myself included.  Never met her before, never heard her music, but saw what drugs did to her and just RAGED after that.
they stay still and idle but they can not sleep
I'm going to go one up and say that whoever made that pic was probably vegan; I see no cheese.
It says you have to have a windows based computer or PC in order to go through them though, which I don't have
Coolness ^
No. Moving towards globalization of government is the only way to regulate ourselves as a species and prevent our own self destruction.
Why? You have a need to feel 10,000 degrees from the shoulders up and 0 K from the waist down or something?
Do you live in Africa?  Where the hell does one obtain so many flies?
That is a very good question. The answer is: it depends. LOL  Basically for bikes in the same price bracket then age makes a big difference, especially for low end bikes. But the difference between a $300 bike and an $1800 bike is in the type of componentry and quality of the parts. A used high end bike (unless thrashed, of course) will pretty much always give you better performance and last longer than a new low end bike.   I am much more familiar with the cutoffs in price in the States than here, but there is always a "price jump" where you incrementally get better until there is a really big price gap and you make it up to the next level of bike.  For example, in the States at least, anything under about $750 will basically be all low end and there isn't a huge difference between a $300 and a $700 bike. But then you just can't buy much of anything between about $900-1300 and from there you jump up to the next level of bike, where the bottom barrel $1300 bike is vastly better than a top of the line $700 one.   The bikes I have (1 road, 1 mountain) are up in that next level where the frame itself will last longer, the parts are higher quality and shift better, can take more damage, and are lighter. My road bike is full carbon and has an Ultegra/Dura-Ace buildup - nothing under a grand can touch it (once again, US prices, everything here is much more expensive).   Also, people with such bikes *tend* to take better care of them (as I do mine) and so you will tend to find cosmetic damage but little in the way of functional damage.   Bottom line: I think that for your price range, getting a new $500 bike would be better than a used $800 since I think they would be in the same low-end bracket. But a new $800 bike wouldn't compare to my used $1,800 mountain bike or my used $2,700 road bike (now I'm speaking Aussie prices). The question is how much will you be using the bike and what for? These would be massive overkill if you are just going to do short commuter rides, no serious mountaineering, and only put in less than 100-200kms a week. That is why I went with the cheap low end bike at first and quickly realized I needed something more.   I'll be headed back stateside in November, so I will be selling my bikes here since they are worth more here than back home. If you aren't sure about what you really want to do vis-a-vis your cycling (I was averaging about 500kms a week on my bikes, often more, and a "normal" ride for me is 60-100kms at a go on the road or 2-3+ hours of serious single track and climbs on the MTB) then I would say start with a middle of the road low end bike (probably around $400-500 here) and see how you feel about it. If you find yourself cycling a lot and making excuses to go farther and complaining about how long it takes your bike to shift or you feel limited by it, then step up to something better (I finally snapped the chain on my low end bike doing some intense hill climbs and so I bought my high-end bikes).   If you find your bike to be pretty much meeting your needs and desires, then stick with that and save the money. Otherwise, contact me in a few months time and I will give you a good and reasonable redditor price for what you want (based on Aussie prices, of course) and make sure you get the bike spick-and-span, clean and perfect, and tuned to the tits. :-)
Inb4 "this smells a little fishy"
I find none of theses satisfactory as a definition for trigonometry. Maybe: "The study of the relations between angles and distances."?
because i know OP would not assume he knew what 3billion people are all thinking with regards to having their work criticized  
I absolutely hate 3d spotting. In BFBC2 and BF3 the person playing the game is not spotting anyone...the game is doing all of the work. All you have to do is click Q and targets pop up. I don't know what was wrong with the old system in BF2 and BF2142 with the commo rose when you aimed at a target that you ACTUALLY spotted with your own two eyes and communicated it with your team. It is frustrating when you are inching your way up prone in bushes or even behind a wall barrier only to be spotted because the other team is spamming Q.
eh team avo are not difficult to deal with these days. they are only a problem on servers with incompetent admins that don't know how to use the tools they have.
Buffalo lol Complete opposite sides of the country. Offer much appreciated!
hell man, I'm sixteen so we're only about two years off of being on the same boat
Surprised he actually won a series.
How would he know if she had life threatening injuries or not? With a crash like that internal injuries are a real possibility, and with a child of that age you don't get very long at all to catch stuff like that, why take the risk?
I've heard it does monologues. :p
And you, my good sir, are a cunt.
Also, anytime anyone complains about generalizations I'm inclined to believe they are a teenager who just doesn't want to be like anyone else.
Why are you so sour buddy? Tell me about it!
I once accidentally killed the enemy jungler using Requiem.
It's a long story that'll probably bore you. Essentially, it's a watered down version of a vastly superior site that the harpy who owns it used to run.
The iPhone natively syncs mail, contacts, and calendars with your google account with active sync. 
I have two stages of backups for my server - backup from the last five minutes and versioned backups from every 20 minutes (I keep the last two weeks worth on disk).  Has saved my ass a few times.
So true. But it's frustrating when it's an airhead who is just there because they have nothing better to do, and you have another lecture to get to or bus to catch. Especially if they monopolize the whole class.
I just tried to say this noise and it was funny.  Was I supposed to try and say it?
The thing is, sometimes I honestly don't care about the objective. Sometimes I just want to run around aimlessly killing people, because its fun and mindless. In a pub that doesn't really matter, I have learned that relying on my teammates gets me killed more often than it helps, especially after the F2P update (no offense, f2pers). In pubs, I play like its Solo Fortress 2, and my team is the cannon fodder.
Some things work because your opponents are incompetant. If it works against a skilled opponent, fine. Some people think everything is terrible except stock, and don't even bother to change their playstyle to fit their equipment. It's also important to realize that noob weapon doesn't mean the same thing to everyone. Some people consider the minigun a noob weapon because it's so easy to use, that doesn't mean it isn't effective, it means it has a low skill requirement. Overall it's a pretty meaningless term and I just interpret it as meaning "I am mad." Why the person is mad varies quite a bit.
I have a newer one also, but I didnt have any trouble. Did you create the goldcard (correctly)?   I used this tool. Its much easier than the manual method.  http://android.modaco.com/content/software/308798/pc-application-goldcardtool/
I was using the Zune software and it decided to start "thinking" and changed a lot of my metadata. Permanently.
I'm on a 7 hour driving trip tomorrow and I'm watching it from Spain :(
Amumu, because he can jungle. It's really effective to have a tank for support/initiation, not to mention his stuns. Then you get two solo lanes, so you can get ganks/fed carries.  Also, I just love to jungle. But no one ever plays tanks. :( Two birds with one stone!
Gorgeous and naughty... What shall we do with you? ...
(Atheist here)  Well, like you said, applying those types of standards--to either religion or science--is not a sound argument to "disbelieve" either "belief." However, I think the line of argument that "religion is bad for the world" has more to do with rejecting the institution of religion, rather than its' internal logic.  Rejection does not necessarily mean disbelief--one can be an atheist, but accept the role of religion as a "net-benefit" entity, but most atheists tend not to do this, and thus go further in their rejection by a "cost-benefit" analysis, like you stated. Having said that, I do believe that religion has had a net negative benefit to humanity; today, we see this negative effect taking the form of rejecting scientific solutions to real problems, such as contraceptives, rights for homosexuals, religious freedoms, and scientific research.  Regardless of what the "majority" of common religious people think and believe, the institutions that claim governance over them have clearly not acted in either their constituents' best interests, or even according to the philosophies they claim to uphold.   TL;DR:  This line of argument is more about rejecting the institution of religion, rather than its inner logic.  
I thought it was Bob Saget before I saw the name.
thank you, for the love of jebus
I love this!!
Dont you mean , she ran out of a bra? she could of at least of kept the signature then. 
Fucking rage comics suck, downvote.
Your name is misleading.
It means.... being dry and misspelled?  o.O
stop ur fucking QQ.
so we´re alle going to be dead in 5 years ?  judgement day ?
It's spelled "Gandelf" because he's an elf.
This is so in Canada.. in Markham.. !
Really?  What part was misinformed?  The part where I say dictionary definitions of anarchism preclude the notion of formal justice systems and elections, or the part where I point out both the USSR and Spain degraded into totalitarian states after flirting with anarchism?  Instead of being an utter douchebag, you could attempt to educate someone you feel is misinformed.  Of course, if you're really just out of arguments because you can't counter any of my points, you're welcome to just say that instead.  Either way would be adding to rational debate, instead of being irrationally proud of yourself for failing to consider other points of view. 
We aren't going to default unless the Republican terrorists refuse to release their hostage.  I really don't understand why Obama doesn't come forward and announce, "Look, let's get one thing straight:  America is not going to default on its debt obligations.  That's not going to happen.  I'm not going to let it happen.  If I have to declare an emergency and claim emergency powers, then I will.  Anybody who seriously intends to destroy the financial standing of this country for whatever reason is an enemy of America and a traitor, and it is my job to stop them.  So I'll keep negotiating until the last minute, but when the time comes, one way or another, America's credit standing will be preserved."  It would be ugly.  Can you imagine?  The right-wing would freak out.  It would validate all their paranoid delusions and throw them into a tizzy, but fuck 'em.  The president has a responsibility to defend America from all enemies, foreign and domestic, and if the Republicans want to play this sick game, then grab your jock strap and let's play ball.
Sadly, 50 years on, that is still pretty much standard in NZ. 
Looks nothing like her to me, but after a google image search, wow, Charlize is really normal-looking without makeup. 
Roach/Infestor (+Broodlord later) or Muta/Ling.   Hydras get raped so hard by Colossus/Storm.
This sounds cool, I might sign up.  What is the data use like though? It used to be really high for multiplayer, is that still true?
The MLG red stream is down for me, could someone update me?&lt;3
No worries! I never had an issue with accidentally 'falling' into a toilet or whatever. How do some women not notice that the seat is up...? 
I will offer the concept that you can reverse engineer any term that does exist by looking at the real phenomenon that it was created to describe, and then figure out another way to describe that phenomenon is.
I just need to know what is etiquette for this situation. 
You would need to do it so that it appears that your left leg is gone, not so that you have 2 right legs or 2 left legs. It is a successful treatment for phantom pain syndrome. If you can trick your brain into thinking your leg is already gone it may ease the symptoms. 
/r/atheism2
Fuck yeah.
Checked!
You win again gravity!
Michael Cera!?
MISOGYNY! MISOGYNY!
I wish you could hear me applauding. :))
I don't believe you. What bacons at midnight, hmm, can you answer that?!?!?!
Oh lawd. Dem panties.
Relevant: http://media.tumblr.com/tumblr_lorngtSHBF1ql7pvr.gif
outline: none; is not always the best option.  The problem http://www.456bereastreet.com/archive/200905/do_not_remove_the_outline_from_links_and_form_controls/  and an alternative http://www.456bereastreet.com/archive/200910/remove_the_outline_from_links_on_active_only/
[Mississippi Pizza](http://www.mississippipizza.com/) in Portland is decent though. Apparently it's fairly obvious I'm an outsider since I'm all like, "lalalala mississippi pizza!". 
TIL cats have green blood
Thanks for that link. I've actually been lost in E. St Louis before, very drunk and trying to find Larry Flynts. I have my CCW, so at least ill feel a bit safer. Or is that park something I should really try to avoid at around 9pm? I'm trying to get a nice nighttime shot of the skyline
Have you tried the [Barney Stinson method](http://www.barneysvideoresume.com/) to update your resume?
Maybe I am wrong, but here information should lead us to do testing, and rethinking the idea of allowing changes to our foods without testing (because that part just makes sense).  There is no proof, but the correlation is interesting enough that we should look into it further. 
And all of them get to keep up military overspending besides.
Something more sinister. Look into it off of his wikipedia page. Keep in mind who it is that we're talking about and which finger it is. 
He may be the best programmer around but he sure knows nothing about the WWW at all.
I don't know about that... I'd say colleges create worker bees not innovators.  Right brain thinkers are a cultural product not an institutional product.  China is now starting to allow pockets of art and 'counter' culture so they can become less dependent others for creativity.   Also I'd have to say my nearest state university seems to pretty much have money out all directions of the ass right now.  
except most of the southern states are highly dependent on federal spending. They would be the first to collapse economically.
get with the times, grandpa
I figured it would be an unreasonable number.
[Swarfega](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Swarfega) (UK) is an excellent non-lathering soap which is ideally suited for industrial use (cleaning grime after working on cars etc.). We all use it in the machine shop.
Well it doesn't work.
just saying.
I just... NO. Am I the only one who thinks he looks like a fuckin ape both in adulthood and in that pic?! He's just not attractive! He has squinty eyes! I just google imaged Ryan Seacrest to see the transformation from megadork to reasonable adult, and Ryan Seacrest is *so* much hotter than Brad Pitt just by virtue of being normal-looking. I do not get the Brad Pitt sex icon thing *at all*. 
They are not.  History shows us things were better when taxes on the upper class were higher.  It also shows a decrease in the size of the middle class as taxes on the rich were decreased.
It's almost as if politicians simply don't understand: Computers are extremely fast copy machines.
And thank you for the interesting discourse!
Haha yea it sucks :/.   As for Pokemon, I need: hitmonlee, nosepass, seedot, pachurisu, carnivine, relicanth, kecleon, cacnea, torkoal, gulpin,makuhita, and chinchou
Why all the downvotes?
Yeah, the safest, but everyone else was given a chance to defend the school.
Sprite + Enough Coca Cola for color = Ginger Ale Substitute.
Elijah wood is hilarious in this show 
So we should set up e, Coli treatment clinics inside police stations?
Ferrothorn comes out, send in reuniclus, free calm mind or focus blast the hell out of him.
All I was missing was the blue copy of Translucence, and my local shop got in about 5 copies last week. The LP I got through RCRD Deals that someone posted a link to awhile back.
I started at $38k as a sous after I finished cooking school and my apprenticeship. 
This ^^
Hey, at least it wasn't a matter of her wrestler brother walking in on you together! And then throwing you out in the snow! The same day you had the funeral for your great-grandma!  And then he pretended to buy a gun.  And he goes to the same college with me, along with her and her cousin (who also threatened me at one point). And me and her share basically all my friends and I don't know if they hate me because I'm a recluse.
Up voted for good reasoning.
You move out yet? 
Respect. 
Want one. That looks fun.
Lived in halls this last year and TVL would send a letter to every room about every month threatening to find out who's watching tv unlicensed and to take action... and never did anything about it. I don't understand why they threaten so toothlessly.
Everything appears to be compatible to me.   The only value adjustment you might be able make is find an on-sale Antec PSU, I know I've seen 650s cheaper than that lately. 
One does not simply walk into an overused joke.
onto the class you came
This is why you use your hand on your ass, wash your hands, then continue water ritual.
anything above 48khz being pointless, y'know, for direct hearing sure, but im certain it does affect the lower frequencies - think of it as different shades of white that normally we cannot see, but used in a painting can completely change its composition, get my flow?  Just cause we can't hear something doesnt mean its not affecting something we DO hear.  Also, thinking about waves, theres cancellation and amplification, the more values the more accurate the main wave can become, innit?
SOURCE: http://diablo.incgamers.com/  edit: the info is from the people that visited blizz hq recently to try out D3
What are animals? Sub-creations?
Don't worry, it took him an hour.
The burn and the ore bucket were my 2 favorite runs, what is yours?
I've got one like this, it's easy enough to write on with a couple sheets of paper on it.
On a related note, fuck you Goodwill. 
I have seen WAY too many road runner cartons to be okay with that.
The Wall wasn't built to keep *wildlings* out...
Totally doable.  Tuck and roll wussy.
The credit cards on file at many vet clinics make them subject to PCI compliance and liable for up to $500k in fines. Pharmaceutical prescriptions given to animals have NPI numbers which has caused some vets to go HIPAA compliant.   IT is about giving employees the tools they need to do the job. The OP asking for Firefox probably doesn't relate to his job, and is just a personal preference. It is not the helpdesk's job to assist people with personal preferences. And installing Firefox, which seems trivial, may actually require compatibility testing, patch management, testbeds, etc all costing the company thousands or more.
I think this could give the previous "[Nothing has ever not happened more than this](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/ix2kd/this_hot_girl_at_a_bar_was_ridiculing_my_friend/c27c037)." a run for its money.
&gt;Explain how depicting Jesus being gay is "mocking" religion.  Christ, you're just being purposefully obstinate at this point. Since I guess you'll pretend not to know what mockery is in your next post, I'll save you the trouble and paste in a definition:  &gt;mockery, noun /ˈmäk(ə)rē/ , An absurd misrepresentation or imitation of something  You don't think that a play portraying Jesus and his apostles as gay men in Texas qualifies? The purpose of the play was to mock religion and piss off Christians. A brief Google search seems to indicate that its reception has included protests and death threats.
Well for vectors, doing basic force problems in physics. Note: a is acceleration, v is velocity and p (my variable) is position. For example a = Δv/Δt = F/m - from Newton's second equation - and solving for position as a function of time.  (Here, I'm assuming a and F are vectors, I just don't have a way to implement them without using LaTeX.)  Here's an example: Let the initial velocity and position of our 2 kg particle be 0 and 0 at t = 0. Suppose the force on our particle is (2, -2, 6) N. What is its position as a function of time?  To start off, a = Δv/Δt = F/m = (1, -1, 3).  One of the standard kinematic equations is Δp = v(0)t + .5at^2 . Since v(0) = (0, 0, 0), we can easily find what Δp is. (Here, Δp is the overall change in position, so it contains information about the x, y and z components.) This equation assumes that a is not a function of position or time, though. If it is, you have to employ different techniques.  If we input what a is in our equation, we get Δp = (0, 0, 0)t + .5(1, -1, 3)t^2 = (.5 t^2 , -.5 t^2 , 1.5 t^2 ) = p(t) - p(0). But since p(0) = (0, 0, 0), we get p(t) = (.5 t^2 , -.5 t^2 , 1.5 t^2 ).  So if we wanted to know where our particle is as a function of time, we would just have to plug in for t.  That's a pretty standard example. There can be more complicated ones (like those dealing with magnetic fields), but that should get the idea across. I'll comment below on some stuff with complex numbers and trig.
And i argue that in the same period that a Woman may abort, a Man should be able to relinquish his rights and responsibilites to the child and end his connection to it, the woman can then choose to raise it alone or have an abortion, we both get our rights to bodily autonomy and i don't get forced into becomming a father.
Well, I lost the reply i made to you, damn. Anyways, if you really want a reply, it's in my other posts in this thread; risk is a part of life, other distractions/impairments are more accepted, and I'm making this judgement sober, so only my personal lack of objectivity is affected, rather than the impairment affecting my decision making at the time, which is meaningless given my post-approval.
No, I'm saying that where there are differences in any societal being, there are circumstances where those differences make it harder to just be. It's an evolutionary principal.
Maxim is amazing - I've had the same problems all my life and was lucky enough to be turned towards this product.  You rub it on nightly at first, usually under armpits, hands and feet (it'll itch when you first start using it) and shower in the morning. After a few uses you'll see increasingly less sweating. After a year you may see little to no sweating with uses numbering a few times or less a month.  It's probably not the healthiest product (it acts to close your pores), but it'll get the job done and make your life a whole lot better. Definitely check this product out.
Err, Tyler fought through the open bracket and landed a spot in pool play from that. Just saying...but I agree about the other players.
Oh.
Even better is if someone knows how I can upload all 171 photos on a webpage for those who prefer that over downloading these photos.
They do if they want all to do the right thing.
It'll be awhile.  Probably won't start till around october and just the blocks at first.   Will take a few months to get it filled up with compost and whatnot.
Almost all cruise ships also use their massive life boats as ferries for when the port the boat stops at cannot handle the large ships, or is too crowded. They're a fantastically smooth ride, dry, and fairly comfortable. Most fit about 30 people without anyone having to stand or share a seat. easily 2-3 times that if people crowd in, and squeeze together.
The flu is fucking killing me muahahahahhaa... but I refuse to take any kind of medicine because I'm tough as a piece of bread
[](/notokay "Bitch give me the keys!")
Yeah, but we don't have to sell our house each time we need surgery.
Yeah I used some weird search terms! Thank you. I'll delete this.
Unfortunately, I seem to only find ones that are romances between Captain Jack Harkness and the 10th Doctor.
The idea is to persuade the border guards that you have enough money for a vacation, and that you aren't here to take someone's job.   (you think I jest...)  More on money:   Visa &amp; Master Card are accepted essentially everywhere.  Card readers here use the magnetic stripe, not the chip+pin system.  Most ATMs dispense $20's, so people regard $50's and $100's with suspicion.  Some shops will refuse to accept large bills (typically gas stations &amp; fast-food places) for fear of counterfeits.  Cards not from that ATM's owner will be charged about $3-5 per transaction.  Instead of carrying a large wad of cash around, perhaps consider getting a few [Visa gift-cards,](http://usa.visa.com/locators/gift-card-locations.jsp) and splitting some of your money up between them.  Then you can carry one in your shoe or otherwise hidden, in case of emergency.
Your english is fine.  you said very same multiple times, emphasizing those words.  You definitely knew what you were saying, you knew it was wrong, and said it anyway.  Im sorry but its hard for me to believe what you're saying at face value.  Best of luck, and I hope you guys do make it to the States.
the combo of salt content and sugar content trigger your body to think it needs more water.  Also cold can make you feel thirsty. ice cream, ice cube, ice pop w/e.
I know, over-hydrating with all that clean water is such a hassle. 
[](/b25) Just realized we both linked to the same dubtrot!  [Cutie Mark Crusader Brohoof!](http://i.imgur.com/HJchI.jpg) 
I'll bring my family!
Oui, il est dans le milleu.
Stare at this while listening to smooth criminal. It fits very well for some reason.  Edit: I've found it works with just about every Michael Jackson song
Isn't the heron supposed to be on the hilt.  How else would be imprinted onto his palm.
See the treaties of Golestan, Turkamanchay and Akhal. 
You have to be severely outmassed to lose to hellions with roaches.
maybe time for a new account? conspiracydebunker doesn't fit with what you've been posting.
The same thing happened with creepers.
what do they look like?
I have a copyright/copyleft on the term Diet Sproke (R) (C) (CC-NonCommercial). Half Diet Coke, Half Sprite.
[This one](http://ksubieyewear.com/collections/product/216/39/1) is worse, I think. 
Christ.
So do you have any theories on what a ghost actually is?
I like how Green Shirt Guy stands right in the middle of the shot leaning on the organ, Fonzie-style.  EDIT: He was turning your music for you, wasn't he? I apologize, I'm a dumbass. Great job, by the way.
I'm not a libertarian at all. I was just pointing out how Hivemind responded like an idiot. While I'm at it, I think you could use someone to point out what an aggressive douche bag *you* are acting like.  Also, no one asked for a response to "all of libertarianism's positions," there was only one question asked with a very specific topic at hand--a topic which actually had absolutely nothing to do with libertarian ideology, but rather with the power of the president on a range of issues. You might want to work on your reading comprehension in addition to your manners.
this is why FMA should never be made into a movie
In my travels of the internet, I have sadly found Reddit to be one of the worst when it comes to plain old misanthropy (I've heard 4chan is worse.) It has gotten a *lot* worse in the past six months, I used to recommend this site to everyone, now I'd be embarrassed to have people know I browse it.
I got them for about $30 a piece. I don't think they are still being pressed to vinyl. 
Drunk driving /=/ stoned driving The most damage you can do while driving stoned is hit a stop sign going 5 mph.
And 99.99999% of that water is returned to the earth in the form of sweat or piss So how does that save water?
Lookup [Delayed Sleep Phase Syndrome (DSPS)](https://secure.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/wiki/Delayed_sleep_phase_syndrome).  It really sucks for people who can't readjust their sleep schedules, but it sounds like you can.
I wasn't implying any imbalance by creating this thread. It was a ZvZ final in the most recent GSL and the top 3 were protoss at the Homestory Cup. It's just sort of interesting how the different races are alternating in their successes at the various tournaments
Thanks!
Congrats, you have partially recognized that every other person in the world doesn't share your precious snowflake point of view. 
Ya, you're probably right. Those plates look European and Britain is the only place in Europe, that I know of, that uses MPH.   But like you said it's just random pics.
What a badass.
Gsnow has the best answer, but i'll offer a pedantic one.  Meta is the Greek word meaning 'beyond,' 'after,' or sometimes 'with.' 
But seriously, Katy Perry's is crazy.
::stands up slowly::
IGETIT. It took a while..
Only an idiot would start a statement so drastically.
The cake is a lie! Or is it?
Worst advertising ever!!! WTF Sabotage.  
A lot of good submissions slip through the cracks.
 Not a single squawk was uttered.
Thing is, I don't really enjoy street racing. I feel like if I ever caused an accident and killed or seriously injured some innocent bystander, I could never live it down. I enjoy more organized racing, my favorite of which being rally.  Anyway, I love your advice about the insurance, thanks a lot!
Is he the only bilingual person you know of?
All of religion is not fictitious narrative. Romans were depicted in the Bible, but they aren't fictitious. It can be argued that many parts of religious narrative are unverifiable, but that doesn't necessarily make them fictitious, nor does it make them true.  I'm not even certain it is tax dollars they are aiming to restrict from the playhouse. It could be donations. It appears to be a private company anyways.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=big5Kd0--b8&amp;feature=player_detailpage#t=218s  Bonus: My usernamesake.
Hey, it's Jackie Chan!  Hi Jackie Chan! You look good. Any chance if you'll do another Rush Hour?
She was an old lady in my Bio class that thought she was a gift to the world, nobody liked her because she talked down to everyone including the prof.
Les Schwab fixes mine for free, and I didn't buy the last pair there.
holy. shit.
and probably can only stop by smacking a wall.  He should shape it like a transformer or gundam and it'd sell millions (in asia at least for the gundam part)
I've got some advice. Stop observing Ramadan and just continue your current workout schedule. You've lost 80 pounds and now you're going to ruin it by putting your body into starvation mode followed by gorging yourself, plus getting shitty workouts because you're starving? Have some sense, your health is more important than your silly religious rules.
But playing random, will make you lose alot, and confuse you even more.  I would rather have new players have great success in the beginning... and you won't have great success as random
because every viable system of living has happened already
Work at a ski resort for a season (free season pass!) making small money while you look further abroad. :D  I am not a professional scientist, but most of my friends are. Many of them just switched jobs after about 5 years experience, mostly finding something more relevant to their interests. Some of them had to move pretty far, but they all managed to stay in Canada.  What is your field of expertise?
I'm not dating anyone, so your case does not apply to me!   [However, you're awesome for matching bra and panties for your husband.](http://cdn.thenextweb.com/wp-content/uploads/2009/01/hi.jpg)
It's a small enough hotel that I seriously doubt there is much tech support at all, if any. But you're right - it can't hurt to let them know. Is there any way for me to fix it from the router's page?
they should have made them listen to the song without the video so they wouldnt know who it was.
As I undersand it, the original belif in the Bible was one of Physical ressurection of the Body, not becasue you had an immortal soul but by the grace of god. There was no need of a hell in this model, simply thouse who would be ressurected and thouse who would reamin dead.   This idea persisted right into the middle ages when some theologens still debated weather or not cannibals could be saved. Some took the position that the bodies of cannibles had been stolen (in bite sized peices) from other humans, and hence could not be ressurected.  The idea of an immortal soul came in from Greek Philosophy. 
To you maybe. People who still enjoy and play the series would say otherwise. Go jerk off to your nostalgia elsewhere. 
MAEK : Fixed that for you.
Wow, you guys have some awesome trails around you!  I wish we had trails like that out here where most land is illegal to ride on.
nice, pretty sweet. any way to view the icons other than whats out?
&gt; You're not a dumbass until you do this twice. Learn.  Sage advice is sage. I'm so using this in future.  That being said, I don't think this guy is a dumb ass at all. He worked hard, is (unexpectedly) sore from it. We've all been there.
Yeah, it should be "Flowers? That's gay."
And just what are YOUR hands doing in the bottom of that picture?   Can't unsee.
Seriously!? Another one?   I won't restate my thoughts  http://www.reddit.com/r/psychology/comments/j4zz0/need_participants_for_a_music_vs_memory_recall/c2980ab
Shake That gets you into the "fuck shit up" mindset?  Yikes, let me enlighten you then: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=P3oBZ4_TNys
ahaha awesome this was seriously may favourite part of this MLG
Seconded!  
CBN = Chicago Bears Network or something. Or .. I dunno. Definitely not the fairytale network. I think they play them on NFL network.. not sure really. I think I watched them last year on myp2p.eu.
You can also insult the girls, call them names etc. I even got a cute lesbian to post a picture.  It worked a shocking amount of times.
Back in the 70s and 80s drivers used to run out of gas and park their cars on the grass right beside the track. It wasn't uncommon for those who made it to the end of the race to go past 6 or 7 parked cars on the last lap.
Yes, but those news stories are usually full of shit when you get the file and read the actual cases. Because it isn't actually legal to throw someone in jail if they cannot pay.  Or it isn't legal to keep them there.  Sorry, people like you was a mean way to put it. It was a father's rights thing.  People thought it wasn't fair that mom could marry some rich new guy and that income wasn't included. I'm not bothering with you! We won't bother with each other.  You know, it is irritating that I'm here on a Sunday, trying to perfect a declaration so a dad can get custody of his kid, and yet you will think I'm "anti-dad" because I challenge your mistaken beliefs about the child support system.  So it goes.
Absolutely no idea - I didn't want to bother with a megaupload file. It's about 100MB though so it probably does have the speech files
You'll get many women if you buy it... Or men, just on how you role. 
Sure thing. I'm in the trade room.
&gt;being a privileged dick  This is kosher for some reason?
The gun show is spasmo's thing. The ass is reserved for dickheads.
You only have a couple years typically before the statute of limitations expires so don't dawdle.  Really this is exactly WHY people SHOULD sue.
So many levels of awesome.
This. 
i gues you've never been there, but in case you have, bring a toad!!!!
You got it! Thanks much! It was Jahova!
Probably the part where I said it, haha. Also, the girl I know that goes up on stage was sort of an ex so it is weird describing her. 
I thought hobos were immune to that sort of thing.
That Finn is cuteness. 
Galio.
human intelligence started on the plains of africa when monkeys touched a monolith.  A million years later humans touched a monolith on the moon which activated a signal to activate a final monolith out by jupiter.  A ship went to get it, there was a subplot about man losing it's creative vigor and a computer becoming an intelligent entity but man touched the final monolith in the end, and just like the monkeys touching it spurred them to their next evolution touching the final monolith let him trancend to some unimaginable next stage of human life, shown to the viewer through symbolic images of him watching himself age and die and be reborn as some embryonic creature. 
Huge deal breaker when going across the entire country.
He's our problem here in New England now... sigh.
Forgetting to use an item active.  Zhonya's off cooldown and I died?  Seriously lame.  
For the record, the debt is just under 1 billion dollars and the club is worth about 3 billion dollars (though would cost about 3.5 billion to buy).
Nope
Maybe the Captain will have a great year this year. Also, around like week 7ish Gamble was tied for the lead in interceptions. Too lazy to look up the final numbers though.  edit: looked it up, I was thinking of S Charles Godfrey. Who only had 5, so that "lead" apparently didn't last too long.
do want
Does not ship internationally 〠_〠
IdrA has a sick Hydra/Ling Nydus timing attack against Potoss forge fast expand.  He used it twice in a row against TT1, winning both games.  Think it was IPL season 2.
I might do that after college. I live in albany so its not that far, besides washington has better fireworks.
Reminds me of KOTOR 2 and some other pc games where cut content got restored by mods. That rarely if ever happens on consoles due to no mods.
